Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 

B.Tech. Civil Engineering 
 

SYLLABUS 
 
 
 
 
 

  
 
 

CREDIT BASED CURRICULUM 
 

(2012 - 2016) 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 

DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL ENGINEERING 

NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY 
TIRUCHIRAPPALLI - 620 015, INDIA. 

 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

CURRICULUM 

B. Tech. (CIVIL ENGINEERING) 

The total minimum credits required for completing the B.Tech. Program in Civil Engineering is 178 (45 + 

133). 

SEMESTER III 
 

Code Course of Study L T P C 
MA203 Probability, Statistics and Linear programming 3 0 0 3 
CE201 Mechanics of Solids-I  2 1 0 3 
CE203 Mechanics of Fluids - I 2 1 0 3 
CE205 Surveying - I 3 0 0 3 
CE207 Geotechnical Engineering - I 3 0 0 3 
CE209 Concrete Technology 3 0 0 3 
CE211 Building Planning and Drawing 0 0 3 2 
CE213 Survey Lab I 0 0 3 2 
CE215 Geotechnical Lab 0 0 3 2 

Total  16 2 9 24 
 

SEMESTER IV 
 

Code Course of Study L T P C 
MA204 Numerical Techniques 2 1 0 3 
CE202 Mechanics of Solids-II  2 1 0 3 
CE204 Mechanics of Fluids - II 3 0 0 3 
CE206 Surveying - II 3 0 0 3 
CE208 Geotechnical Engineering - II 3 0 0 3 
CE210 Environmental Engineering - I 3 0 0 3 
CE214 Survey Lab II 0 0 3 2 
CE216 Strength of Materials Lab 0 0 3 2 

Total  16 2 6 22 
 

SEMESTER V 
 

Code Course of Study L T P C 
CE301 Environmental Engineering - II 2 0 2 3 
CE303 Structural Analysis - I 2 1 0 3 
CE305 Concrete Structures -I 3 0 2 4 
CE307 Steel Structures - I 2 0 2 3 
CE309 Hydraulic Machinery 3 0 0 3 
CE311 Advanced Strength of Materials 3 0 0 3 
CE313 Fluid Mechanics Lab  0 0 3 2 
CE315 Environmental Engineering Lab 0 0 3 2 

Total  15 1 12 23 

 1 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

SEMESTER VI 
 

Code Course of Study L T P C 
CE302 Structural Analysis - II 2 1 0 3 
CE304 Transportation Engineering - I 2 1 0 3 
CE306 Concrete Structures-II 3 0 2 4 
CE308 Steel Structures - II 2 0 2 3 
CE310 Water Resources Engineering  3 0 0 3 

 Elective - 1 3 0 0 3 
CE312 Computer Aided Design - I 0 0 3 2 
CE314 Estimation, Costing and Valuation 0 0 3 2 

Total  15 2 10 23 
 

SEMESTER VII 
 

Code Course of Study L T P C 
CE401 Matrix Methods of Structural Analysis 2 1 0 3 
CE403 Transportation Engineering - II 3 0 0 3 
CE405 Irrigation and Hydraulic Structures 2 0 2 3 
HM401 Industrial Economics  3 0 0 3 

 Elective – 2 3 0 0 3 
 Elective – 3 3 0 0 3 

CE407 Computer Aided Design - II 0 0 3 2 
CE447 Comprehensive Viva - Voce 0 0 6 3 

Total  16 1 11 23 
 

SEMESTER VIII 
 

Code Course of Study L T P C 
MB491 Management Concepts and Practices  3 0 0 3 
CE402 Prestressed Concrete Structures 3 0 0 3 

 Elective – 4 3 0 0 3 
 Elective – 5 3 0 0 3 

CE498 Project Work  0 0 12 6 
Total  12 0 12 18 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 2 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

ELECTIVES  
 

Code Course of Study L T P C 
CE352 Groundwater Hydrology  3 0 0 3 
CE451 Experimental Stress Analysis 3 0 0 3 
CE452 Earthquake Resistant Structures 3 0 0 3 
CE453 Remote Sensing and GIS  3 0 0 3 
CE454 Advanced Foundation Engineering 3 0 0 3 
CE455 Hydrology 3 0 0 3 
CE456 Water Power Engineering 3 0 0 3 
CE457 Structural Dynamics 3 0 0 3 
CE458 Finite Element Method 3 0 0 3 
CE459 Models for Air and Water Quality 3 0 0 3 
CE460 Transportation planning 3 0 0 3 
CE461 Pavement Analysis and Design 3 0 0 3 
CE462 Advanced Surveying Techniques 3  0 0 3 
CE463 Steel-Concrete Composite Structures 3 0 0 3 
CE464 Geotechnical Earthquake Engineering        3 0 0 3 
ME453 Industrial Safety 3 0 0 3 
ME457 Computational Fluid Dynamics 3 0 0 3 
AR451 Urban and Regional Planning  3 0 0 3 
MA302 Operations Research Techniques in Civil Engineering 3 0 0 3 
HM404 Creative writing through literature 3 0 0 3 

 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 3 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

SEMESTER III 
 
MA203 PROBABILITY, STATISTICS AND LINEAR PROGRAMMING 
 
Course objectives 
 
 To understand the concepts of Probability, Statistics and Linear Programming which arise in 

engineering applications 
 To study the defects arising in any of the engineering products 
 To study the quality of the components purchased for the projects 
 To study the optimization techniques for various problems 
 To study the Transportation and Assignment problems 

 
Course Content 
 
Total, Compound, Marginal and conditional probability, Bayes' theorem - Binomial, Poisson and Normal 
distributions, Moment generating function, Characteristic function 
Central Limit Theorem, Law of large numbers, Tests of significance, large and small samples, t- test, F-
test and chi-square test for goodness of fit. 
Estimation theory, ANOVA table and analysis, Multiple and partial correlation - Regression  
Convex spaces, LPP statement, basic feasible solution, Graphical solution - Slack and surplus 
variables - Artificial variable technique - Charne's penalty method - Two phase method - Dual simplex 
method - Primal dual problems, Transportation and Assignment problems.  
Integer programming - Gomory's cutting plane method - Branch and bound method  
 
References 
 
1. Gupta. S.C. and Kapoor. V.K., Fundamentals of Mathematical Statistics, 7th Edition, Sultan Chand 

and Sons, 1980. 
2. Kantiswarup, Gupta P.K. and Man Mohan, Operations Research, 11th Edition, Sultan Chand and 

Sons, 2003. 
  
Course outcomes 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 
 apply the principles and techniques learnt in this course for solving the practical problems which 

arise in the industry 
 use Estimation Theory and Regression Analysis to estimate the present condition from previous 

history in any real life situation 
 apply LPP to Transportations problems which is essential for a Civil Engineer 
 apply Probability in Reliability and life testing machine tools in Civil Engineering  
 solve the Linear Programming problems for minimizing the project cost and maximizing its profit 

 
CE201 MECHANICS OF SOLIDS – I 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To learn about the concept of stress, strain and deformation of solid and state of stress 

 4 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 To know the concepts of strain energy, principal stress and principal planes  
 To learn the bending moment, shear force and the corresponding stress distribution for  

different types of beams 
 To learn the analysis of plane truss, thin cylinders and shells 
 To understand the theory of torsion and stresses in springs 

 
Course Content 
 
Tension, compression and shear stresses - Hooke's law - elastic constants - compound stresses - 
composite bars - thermal stresses. 
Strain Energy due to axial force - Resilience - stresses due to impact and suddenly applied load - 
Principal stress and principal planes - Mohr's circle  
Beams and support conditions -Types of supports and loads - shear force and bending moment - their 
diagrams for simply supported beams, cantilevers and overhanging beams. Theory of simple bending - 
Stress distribution at a cross section due to Bending Moment and Shear - strain energy.  
Analysis of plane truss - Method of joints - Method of sections - Thin cylinders and shells. 
Theory of torsion - Torsion of circular and hollow circular shafts and shear stresses due to torsion - 
closed and open coiled helical springs - leaf spring. 
 
References 
 
1. Vazirani, V.N. and Ratwani, N.M., Strength of Materials, Vol I, Khanna Publishers, 1996. 
2. Kazimi, Mechanics of Solids, Tata McGraw - Hill, 2004. 
3. Timoshenko, S.P. and Gere, J.M., Mechanics of Materials, Tata McGraw Hill, 1992.  
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 determine the strength parameters of the materials 
 solve principal stress and principal plane problems 
 apply various methods of analysis of plane truss 
 determine shear force, bending moment, bending and shear stress distribution 
 analyze members subjected to torsion 

 
CE203 MECHANICS OF FLUIDS – I 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the properties of fluids and fluid statics 
 To derive the equation of conservation of mass and its application 
 To solve kinematic problems such as finding particle paths and stream lines 
 To use important concepts of continuity equation, Bernoulli’s equation and turbulence, and 

apply the same to problems 
 To analyze laminar and turbulent flows 

 
Course Content 
 
Continuum concept - CGS, MKS and SI systems - Properties of Fluids - Ideal and real fluid - Pressure 
at a point – pressure variation - pressure measurement 

 5 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Hydrostatic forces on plane and curved surfaces - Buoyancy and equilibrium - Metacentric height and 
its determination-Types of flow - continuity equation for one, two and three dimensional flows - stream 
function and velocity potential - flow net and its properties  
Convective  and  local acceleration - Pressure,  Kinetic and Datum energy  - Bernoulli's  theorem    and  
proof - Euler's  equations of  motion  for  a  three  dimensional  flow  and along a streamline - Deduction 
of Bernoulli's  theorem  - Momentum  equation - applications. 
Reynold's  experiment - Laminar  and  turbulent  flow  - Reynold's number  -  critical flow  -  Navier-
Stoke  equations of motion  -  shear stress and pressure gradient - Laminar flow  between parallel 
plates  -  Couette flow -  Hagen Poiseuille equation for flow through circular pipes. 
Turbulence - semi empirical theories –Major losses - Darcy-Weisbach equation  for flow through circular 
pipe - Friction  factor - Smooth and rough pipes - Moody diagram - flow  through noncircular  pipe -  
Minor losses - pipes  in  series  and  parallel - Equivalent length - Introduction to water hammer 
phenomena. 
 
References 
 
1. Nagaratnam, S., Fluid Mechanics, Khanna Publishers, 1995. 
2. Natarajan, M.K. Principles of Fluid Mechanics, Oxford & IBH Publishing Co, 1994. 
3. Jagdish Lal, Hydraulics and Fluid Mechanics, Tata McGraw Hill, 2001. 
4. Streeter V.L., Fluid mechanics, Tata McGraw Hill, 1998.  
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 determine the properties of fluid and pressure and their measurement 
 compute forces on immersed plane and curved plates 
 apply continuity equation and energy equation in solving problems on flow through conduits 
 compute the frictional loss in laminar and turbulent flows 
 analyse flow between reservoirs 

 
CE205 SURVEYING - I  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the importance of surveying in the field of civil engineering 
 To study the basics of linear/angular measurement methods like chain surveying, compass 

surveying 
 To study the significance of plane table surveying in plan making 
 To know the basics of levelling and theodolite survey in elevation and angular measurements 
 To understand tacheometric surveying in distance and height measurements  

 
Course Content 
 
Introduction and Principles of surveying – Classification – Brief introduction to chain surveying – 
Chaining and ranging - Compass surveying – Prismatic compass only – Instruments – Bearing of 
survey lines – systems and conversions – Local attraction – Latitude and departure – Traversing – 
Traverse adjustment of closing errors. 

 6 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Plane Table surveying – instruments and accessories – advantages and disadvantages of plane table 
surveying – methods – radiation, intersection, traversing, resection – Two and three point problems – 
errors in plane table surveying. 
Levelling – Definitions – Levelling instruments – Temporary and permanent adjustments – Booking – 
Reduction to levels – Correction for  Curvature and refraction – Classification of leveling – Profile 
Levelling – Differential levelling – Reciprocal levelling – longitudinal and cross sectioning - Contours – 
Contour interval – Methods of contouring – uses. 
Theodolite surveying – Vernier theodolite – Temporary and permanent adjustments – Measurement of 
horizontal and vertical angles – Methods of repetition and reiteration – errors in theodolite surveying – 
elimination of errors - Area and volume computation – area from latitude and departure – Simpson’s 
rule and Trapezoidal rule. 
Tacheometric surveying  – Principles – Methods – Stadia system –Fixed and Movable hair  methods – 
Methods with staff held vertical and normal – Analytic lens – Subtense bar  – Tangential method. 
 
References 
 
1. Duggal, S.K. Surveying Vol. I and II, Tata McGraw Hill, 2004.   
2. Punmia, B.C. Surveying Vol.I and II, Standard Publishers, 1994. 
3. Arora, K. R. Surveying Vol. I and II, Standard Book House, 1996 

.   
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 carry out preliminary surveying in the field of civil engineering applications such as structural, 
highway engineering and geotechnical engineering  

 plan a survey, taking accurate measurements, field booking, plotting and adjustment of 
traverse 

 use various conventional instruments involved in surveying with respect to utility and precision 
 plan a survey for applications such as road alignment and height of the building 
 undertake measurement and plotting in civil engineering  

 
CE207 GEOTECHNICAL ENGINEERING - I  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To explain what Geotechnical Engineering is and how it is important to civil engineering 
 To explain how three phase system is used in soil and how are soil properties estimated using 

three phase system 
 To explain role of water in soil behavior and how soil stresses, permeability and quantity of 

seepage including flow net are estimated  
 To determine shear parameters and stress changes in soil due to foundation loads   
 To estimate the magnitude and time-rate of settlement due to consolidation  

 
Course Content 
 
Historical development of Soil Engineering - Origin and general types of soils - soil structure, clay 
minerals-Three phase system- Identification and Classification of soils 

 7 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Soil  water - capillary phenomena - concept of effective  and neutral  stresses - Permeability   -   
determination  of  coefficient  of  permeability  in the  laboratory -  Seepage flow -  Head, gradient, 
pressure - steady state flow - two dimensional - flow net. 
Vertical  stress  distribution  in  soil  -  Boussinesq and Westergaard's equation  -  Newmark's  influence 
chart - principle,  construction and use - Equivalent point load and other approximate methods - 
pressure bulb. Compaction  
Shear  strength  -  Mohr-Coulomb failure  criterion - shear  strength  tests  -  Different  drainage  
conditions  -  Shear  properties of cohesionless and cohesive soils - Use of  Mohr's  circle  - relationship 
between principal stresses  and  shear  parameters. 
Compressibility  and  consolidation  - Terzaghi's  one dimensional consolidation theory  -  pressure  
void   ratio  relationship  - preconsolidation pressure - Total  settlement and  time  rate of settlement - 
coefficient of consolidation - curve fitting methods - Correction for construction time. 
 
References 
 
1. Gopal Ranjan and Rao, P. Basic and Applied Soil Mechanics, New Age International Pvt. Limited, 

New Delhi, 2002. 
2. Murthy, V.N.S., A text book of Soil Mechanics and Foundation Engineering, UBS Publishers 

Distributors Ltd., New Delhi, 1999 
3. Punmia, B.C. Soil Mechanics and Foundation Engineering, Laxmi Publications Pvt. Ltd., New Delhi, 

1995. 
4. Braja M. Das, Fundamentals of Geotechnical Engineering, Thomson Asia Pvt. Ltd., Singapore, 

2005. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 carry out soil classification  
 solve three phase system problems  
 solve any practical problems related to soil stresses estimation, permeability and seepage 

including flow net diagram   
 estimate the stresses under any system of foundation loads 
 solve practical problems related to consolidation settlement and time rate of settlement  

 
CE209 CONCRETE TECHNOLOGY 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the properties of ingredients of concrete 
 To study the behavior of concrete at its fresh and hardened state 
 To study about the concrete design mix 
 To know about the procedures in concreting 
 To understand special concrete and their use 

 
Course Content 
 
Introduction - Concrete materials - Cement: Physical tests on cement - Concrete materials - Tests on 
aggregates - Quality of Water for mixing and curing - use of sea water for mixing concrete 

 8 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Mix Design - factors influencing mix proportion - Mix design by ACI method and I.S. code method - 
Design of high strength concrete. 
Admixtures  - accelerating admixtures - Retarding  admixtures  -  water  reducing  admixtures  - Air  
entraining admixtures - coloring agent - Plasticizers. Batching - Mixing -Transportation - Placing of 
concrete - curing of Concrete 
Strength of Concrete - Shrinkage  and temperature effects - creep of concrete - permeability of concrete  
- durability of concrete - Corrosion - Causes and effects - remedial measures- Thermal  properties  of  
concrete - Micro cracking of concrete. 
Special Concrete - light weight concrete - Fibre reinforced concrete - Polymer-polymer modified 
concrete - Ferrocement - Mass concrete - Ready mix concrete- Self compacting concrete- Quality 
control - Sampling and testing-Acceptance criteria 
 
References 
 
1. Shetty, M.S., Concrete Technology, Theory & Practice, S.Chand and Co, 2004. 
2. Gambhir, M.L., Concrete Technology, Tata McGraw Hill, 2004. 
3. Nevile, Properties of Concrete, Longman Publishers, 2004. 
4. Santakumar A.R., Concrete Technology, Oxford University Press, New Delhi, 2007. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 test all the concrete materials as per IS code 
 design the concrete mix using ACI and IS code methods 
 determine the properties of fresh and hardened of concrete 
 design special concretes and their specific applications 
 ensure quality control while testing/ sampling and acceptance criteria 

 
CE211 BUILDING PLANNING AND DRAWING 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the principles of planning and bylaws 
 To draw plan, elevation and section of load bearing and framed structures 
 To draw plan, elevation and section of public and industrial structures 
 To prepare detailed working drawing for doors, windows, etc. 

 
Course Content 
 
Classification of buildings - Principles of planning - Dimensions of buildings - Building bye-laws for floor 
area ratio, open spaces - Orientation of buildings - Lighting and Ventilation- Planning and preparing 
sketches and working drawings of Residential buildings (Flat and sloping roof), Schools, Hostels, 
Hospitals, Single-storey factory buildings with trusses. Detailed working drawings of the component 
parts - Doors and Windows - Roof Trusses - Staircases-Toilets 
 
References 
 
1. Shah M.G. Kalec. M. & Patki SY Building Drawing, Tata Mcgraw Hill, New Delhi, 2000 
 

 9 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the principles of planning and bylaws used for building planning 
 draw plan, elevation and section for various structures 

 
CE213 SURVEY LAB – I 
 
Course objective: 
 
The Lab sessions would include experiments on 
 

 Chain Surveying 
 Chain Traverse 
 Compass Surveying 
 Compass surveying Traversion 
 Plane Table Surveying – Radiation, intersection, Traverse, Resection Leveling 

 
Course Content 
1. Chain surveying  
2. Chain traverse 
3. Compass surveying  
4. Compass traverse-open and close traverse 
5. Plane table surveying 
6. Leveling: Fly leveling and contouring  
7. Radiation, intersection-Traverse- Resection 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
 On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 use conventional surveying tools such as chain/tape, compass, plane table, level in the field of 
civil engineering applications such as structural plotting and highway profiling 

 apply the procedures involved in field work and to work as a surveying team 
 plan a survey appropriately with the skill to understand the surroundings 
 take accurate measurements, field booking, plotting and adjustment of errors can be 

understood 
 plot traverses / sides of building and determine the location of points present on field on a piece 

of paper 
 
CE215 GEOTECHNICAL LAB 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To estimate index properties of soils (coarse and fine)  
 To estimate consistency limit of fine grained soils 
 To estimate shear strength of soils by direct shear test, triaxial shear test, vane shear test 

& unconfined compressive test 

 10 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 To estimate the engineering properties of the soils by density test, CBR test permeability 
test and consolidation test 

 
Course Content 
 
1. Grain Size analysis   
2. Consistency limits  
3. Specific gravity   
4. Permeability tests 
5. Unconfined compression test   
6. Direct shear test 
7. Core cutter and sand replacement    
8. Compaction test 
9. California bearing ratio test                         
10. Vane shear test   
11. Triaxial test   
12. Consolidation test 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 classify soil by physical observation of the soils  
 classify soil based on estimated index and engineering characteristics of soils 
 carry out interpolation among the estimated soil design parameters 

 
SEMESTER IV 

 
MA202 NUMERICAL TECHNIQUES  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To study various numerical techniques 
 To study the behavior of the solution of linear/non-linear differential equations 
 To study the solution of heat conduction/ wave equation numerically 
 To find approximate solutions with minimum error 
 To learn algorithms for computers to solve problems in math, science and engineering 

 
Course Content 
 
Solution of linear system - Gaussian elimination and Gauss-Jordan methods - LV decomposition 
methods - Crout's method - Jacobi and Gauss-Seidel iterative methods sufficient conditions for 
convergence - Power method to find the dominant eigenvalue and eigenvector 
Solution of nonlinear equation - Bisection method - Secant method - Regula falsi method - Newton- 
Raphson method for f(x) = 0 and for f(x,y) = 0, g(x,y) = 0 - Order of convergence - Horner's method - 
Graeffe's method - Bairstow's method.  
Newton's forward backward and divided difference interpolation - Lagrange's interpolation - Numerical 
Differentiation and Integration - Trapezoidal rule - Simpson's 1/3 and 3/8 rules - Curve fitting - Method 
of least squares and group averages.  
Numerical Solution of Ordinary Differential Equations- Euler's method - Euler's modified method - 

 11 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Taylor's method and Runge-Kutta method for simultaneous equations and 2nd order equations - 
Multistep methods - Milne's and Adams' methods.  
Numerical solution of Laplace equation and Poisson equation by Liebmann's method solution of one 
dimensional heat flow equation - Bender - Schmidt recurrence relation Crank - Nicolson method - 
Solution of one dimensional wave equation.  
 
References  
 
1. Gerald, CF., and Wheatley, P.O., Applied Numerical Analysis, Mis. Addison Wesley, 1989.  
2. Jain, MK., Iyengar,S.R.,and Jain,R.K., Numerical Methods for Scientific and Engineering 

Computation, Wiley Eastern, 1991.  
3. Kandasamy, P.Thilagavathy, K., and Gunavathy,S., Numerical Methods, Chand and Co., 1997.  
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 solve linear and non-linear equations using numerical techniques 
 solve linear and non-linear differential equations using numerical techniques 
 solve a system of equations using the techniques studied 

 
CE202 MECHANICS OF SOLIDS – II 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the concept of Principle of virtual work 
 To study the different methods of finding deflection of beam 
 To analyze the Indeterminate beams subjected to various loading 
 To study the different methods to find the deflection of truss 
 To analyze the column with different end conditions and stress in thick cylinders 

 
Course Content 
 
Principle of virtual displacement and virtual forces - Castigliano's first theorem - Maxwell's reciprocal 
theorem. Determination of deflection curve of beams- double integration - Macaulay's method - Area 
moment method - Conjugate beam method - strain energy and dummy unit load approaches to 
deflection of Simple and Curved members. Statically indeterminate Structures - Propped cantilever, 
fixed and continuous beams - Theorem of three moments - Bending moment and shear force diagrams  
Thick cylinders   - Lame's equation - Shrink fit - compound cylinders. 
Deflection of trusses - Dummy unit load method - Strain energy method - Williot Mohr's diagram 
Theory of columns: Axial load- Euler's theory-Rankines formula, combined bending and axial load 
 
References 
 
1. Vazirani,V.N. and Ratwani, N.M. Strength of Materials, Vol. II,  Kanna Publishers, 1996. 
2. Timoshenko, S.P. and Gere, J.M. Mechanics of Materials, Tata McGraw Hill, 1992 
3. Rajput R.K., Strength of Materials, S. Chand & Co., Ltd., 1996. 
 
 
 

 12 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the principle of virtual work 
 determine deflection of a beam for various loading conditions 
 apply unit load method to find the deflection of truss 
 determine different stresses developed in thick cylinders 
 visualize the behavior of column for combined bending and axial loading 

 
CE204 MECHANICS OF FLUIDS - II  
 

Course objectives: 
 

 To classify the types of flows in open channel and also to design open channel sections in a 
most economical fashion with minimum wetted perimeter and learn about critical flows 

 To study about non uniform flows in open channel and longitudinal slopes in open channel and 
also to learn about the characteristics of hydraulic jump 

 To develop an understanding of fluid flow patterns and learns to use boundary layer theory and 
drag 

 To provide insights to the open channel hydraulics and introduce dimensional analysis for fluid 
flow problems 

 To study in detail about boundary layers theory 
 

Course Content 
 

Ideal fluid flow- Uniform flow- source - sink- doublet - combination of flow patterns - uniform flow and 
source- flow around cylinder - flow with circulation - lift. Boundary layer  - displacement and momentum 
thickness  - development of flow in circular pipes - Von Karman momentum equation  - Laminar and 
turbulent boundary layers on flat plates  - Drag in flat plates, cylinders and spheres - Drag coefficients - 
Boundary layer control.  
Open Channel Flow - Classification - Terminology - velocity distribution in open channels - Chezy, 
Manning and other formulae - Best hydraulic section - specific energy - specific force - hydraulic jump     
and its characteristics - Gradually varied flow - computation of surface profiles. Velocity measurement 
with Pitot tube, Prandtl Pitot tube and current meter - discharge measurement in pipe flow - 
venturimeter, mouthpiece, orificemeter, nozzlemeter, bendmeter and rotameter - discharge 
measurement in open channel flow - All types of notches and weirs, venturiflume - critical depth meter - 
basic principles. Introduction to CFD- Dimensional homogeneity - dimensional analysis - Rayleigh`s 
method - Buckingham Pi theorem - applications - significance of   dimensionless numbers - Model study 
and similitude  - scale effect and distorted models . 
 

References 
 

1. Streeter, V.L. Fluid Mechanics, Tata McGraw Hill, 1998.   
2. Chow, V.T. Open Channel Hydraulics, Tata McGraw Hill, 1975.  
3. Nagaratnam, S. Fluid Mechanics, Khanna Publishers, 1989.   
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 

 visualize fluid flow phenomena observed in Civil Engineering systems such as flow in a pipe, 
flow measurement through orifices, mouth pieces, notches and weirs 

 13 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 analyze fluid flows in open channel hydraulics and devices such as weirs and flumes 
 apply dimensional analysis and the concept of CFD 
 design open channels for most economical sections like rectangular, trapezoidal and circular 

sections 
 measure velocity through instruments in open channel and pipe flow 

 

CE206 SURVEYING – II 
 

Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the basics and elements of different types of curves on roads and their 
preliminary survey  

 To learn about surveying applications in setting out of curves, buildings, culverts and tunnels 
 To get introduced to different geodetic methods of survey such as triangulation, trigonometric 

leveling  
 To learn about errors in measurements and their adjustments in a traverse 
 To get introduced to modern advanced surveying techniques involved such as Remote 

sensing, Total station, GPS, Photogrammetry etc. 
 

Course Content 
  
Curve setting – Horizontal curves - Elements of simple and compound curves – Methods of setting out 
– Reverse curve – Transition curve – Length of curve – Elements of cubic parabola, true spiral and 
cubic spiral – Vertical curve – parabola – Setting out of buildings – culverts –  tunnels. 
Triangulation – different networks – orders and accuracies – intervisibility and height of stations – 
signals and towers – Baseline measurement – instruments and accessories – tape corrections – 
extension of baseline – satellite stations – Reduction to centre. 
Trignometrical levelling – Observations for heights and distances – Geodetic observations – 
Corrections for refraction, curvature, axis signal – Reciprocal observations. 
Errors – Types of errors – Theory of least squares – weighted observations – most probable value – 
computations of indirectly observed quantities – method of normal equations – conditioned quantities,  
method of correlates, method of differences – adjustment of simple triangle and quadrilateral network 
without central station. 
Electromagnetic distance measurement (EDM) – Principle – Types – Total station - Photogrammetry – 
Terrestrial and Aerial photographs – Photo interpretation – Stereoscopy - Remote Sensing – Principle – 
Idealized remote sensing system – Types – applications - Introduction to GPS – Segments – Principle 
of working – application. 
 

References 
 

1. Duggal, S.K. Surveying Vol. I and II, Tata McGraw Hill, 2004. 
2. Punmia, B.C. Surveying Vol.I and II, Standard Publishers, 1994. 
3. Arora, K. R. Surveying Vol. I and II, Standard Book House, 1996. 
4. Satheesh Gopi. Advanced Surveying, Pearson Education, 2007. 
5. Satheesh Gopi. The Global Positioning System and Surveying using GPS, Tata McGraw, 2005. 

 

Course outcomes: 
 

On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 set out curves, buildings, culverts and tunnels  
 carry out a geodetic survey, taking accurate measurements using instruments and adjusting 

the traverse 

 14 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 apply mathematical adjustment of accidental errors involved in surveying measurements 
 plan a survey for applications such as road alignment and height of the building 
 invoke advanced surveying techniques over conventional methods in the field of civil 

engineering 
 
CE208 GEOTECHNICAL ENGINEERING – II 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To emphasize the importance of soil investigations including destructive and 
nondestructive methods 

 To explain how earth pressure theory is important in retaining structure design  
 To explain the concept of bearing capacity and how to estimate the safe bearing capacity 

for various foundation system including settlement consideration 
 To explain how do select a suitable shallow foundation system for various site conditions 

and also analysis of different foundation system 
 To explain in what circumstances pile is needed and how do analysis the pile and pile 

group under various soil conditions  
 

Course Content 
 
Soil exploration - Planning - Augur boring - Soundings - Sampling - Plate load test, static and dynamic 
penetrations tests - geophysical explorations - Lateral Earth Pressure - Plastic equilibrium  -  Rankine's  
theory  - Active and passive earth pressure for  cohesionless and cohesive soils - Earth pressure at rest 
- Coloumb's wedge     theory - Rebhann's  and  Culmann's graphical solutions, Stability analysis 
Foundation - functions and requisites- Different types - choice of foundation type – general principles of 
design. Bearing capacity - types of failures - Prandtl's and Terzaghi's bearing capacity analysis - 
Bearing capacity based on settlement and building codes  
Shallow foundation - spread footings - combined footings - trapezoidal and strap footings - Raft   
foundation - Contact pressure distribution - settlement analysis - Types of settlement, control 
Deep foundation - piles  - types  - load carrying capacity of pile - static and dynamic formula  - pile load 
test - penetration test - pile groups  - Efficiency  -  Feld's  rule  -  Converse  Labarre   formula,  
Settlement of piles and pile groups - Negative skin  friction  - under reamed piles 
 
References 
 
1. Murthy, V.N.S, A text book of Soil Mechanics and Foundation Engineering, UBS Publishers & 

Distributors Pvt. Ltd., New Delhi 1999. 
2. Punmia, B.C., Soil Mechanics and Foundation Engineering, Laxmi Publications Pvt. Ltd., New Delhi, 

1995. 
3. Gopal  Ranjan  and  Rao, Basic and  Applied  Soil  Mechanics,  New Age International (P) Limited, 

New Delhi, 2002. 
4. Braja M. Das, Principles of Foundation Engineering, Thomson Asia Pvt. Ltd., Singapore, 2005. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 carry out soil investigation for any civil engineering construction  
 analyse earth retaining structures for any kind of soil medium  

 15 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 estimate bearing capacity using IS code methods 
 design proper foundations for any kind of shallow foundation system  
 estimate pile and pile group capacity for any kind of soil including group efficiency and 

negative friction 
 
CE210 ENVIRONMENTAL ENGINEERING - I  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To make the students conversant with sources and its demand of water 
 To understand the basic characteristics of water and its determination 
 To expose the students to understand the design of water supply lines 
 To provide adequate knowledge about the water treatment processes and its design 
 To have adequate knowledge on operation and maintenance of water supply 

 
Course Content 
 
Physical, chemical and biological characteristics of water - water analysis- IS and WHO standards- 
Requirements of water supply - Types of demand and their contribution - rate of consumption - 
Forecasting the population- variation in demand pattern.  
Sources of water - quantitative and qualitative studies. Intakes - Channels and pipes for conveying 
water -- Pipes- hydraulic design of pressure pipe- Materials - laying- joining- testing - pipe 
appurtenances- Pumps and pumping stations 
Treatment plants - process of treatments - mixing, aeration, sedimentation, coagulation, filtration, 
disinfection, softening - advanced water treatment. Distribution systems - analysis of distribution 
networks  
Operation and maintenance of water supply to buildings - Rural water supply - Protected water supply - 
Saline water intrusion.  
 
Note: Assignments include the drawings of various water treatment units. 
 
References 
 
1. Manual on Water supply and Treatment - CPHEEO, 1999 
2. Birdie, G.S.  and Birdie, Water  Supply  and  Sanitary Engineering, Dhanpat Rai & Sons, 1992.  
3. Duggal, K.N.  Elements of Environmental Engineering, S.Chand & Co, 2002. 
4. Punmia B.C, Ashok Jain & Arun Jain, Water Supply Engineering, Laxmi Publications, Pvt. Ltd., 

New Delhi, 2004.  
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 identify the source of water and water demand 
 apply the water treatment concept and methods 
 apply water distribution processes and operation and maintenance of water supply 
 prepare basic process designs of water and wastewater treatment plants collect, reduce, 

analyze, and evaluate basic water quality data   
 

 16 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

CE214 SURVEY LAB – II 
 
Course objectives: 
 
The Lab sessions would include extensive experiments on 
 

 Theodolite survey 
 Trignometric leveling to determine heights/elevations 
 Tacheometry  
 Setting of curves 

 
Course Content 
 
1. Theodolite surveying  
2. Single plane observation of trignometrical leveling 
3. Two plane method 
4. Determination of Tacheometric Constants 
5. Tangential Tacheometry 
6. Subtense Bar 
7. Setting out of curves, Buildings layout. 
8. Total station 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 use the theodolite along with chain/tape, compass on the field 
 apply geometric and trigonometric principles of basic surveying calculations 
 plan a survey, taking accurate measurements, field booking, plotting and adjustment of errors 
 apply field procedures in basic types of surveys, as part of a surveying team 
 employ drawing techniques in the development of a topographic map 

 
CE216 STRENGTH OF MATERIALS LAB 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To find the Young Modulus, torsional strength, hardness and tensile strength of given 
specimens 

 To find impact value and crushing value of coarse aggregates 
 To find the compressive strength of concrete cubes and bricks 
 To find stiffness of open coiled and closed coiled springs 
 To find the physical properties of given coarse aggregate, fine aggregate and cement samples 

 
Course Content 
 
1. Test on springs  
2. Deflection test 
3. Torsion test  
4. Tension test 

 17 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

5. Hardness test  
6. Tests on brick 
7. Tests on cement  
8. Tests on concrete  
9. Tests on aggregate  
10. Tests on bitumen 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 
 evaluate Young Modulus, torsional strength, hardness and tensile strength of given specimens 
 determine the strength of coarse aggregates 
 find the compressive strength of concrete cubes and bricks 
 find stiffness of open coiled and closed coiled springs 
 determine the physical properties of given coarse aggregates, fine aggregates and cement samples 

 
SEMESTER V 

 
CE301 ENVIRONMENTAL ENGINEERING – II 
Course objectives: 
 
 To learn the basics of sewage composition and its characteristics 
 To depict the information about various sewage treatment processes 
 To provide the adequate information on various disposal standards for industrial effluents 
 To study the information about air pollution and its effects 
 To understand the knowledge about solid waste generation and disposal methods 

Course Content 
 
Characteristics and composition of sewage-sampling-analysis- population equivalent - drainage in 
buildings-plumbing systems for drainage 
Primary treatment- Secondary treatment- biokinetics- Lagooning- sludge digestion-Tertiary treatment 
Disposal standards- self purification of rivers- Streeter Phelps equation - oxygen sag curve  
Toxic and hazardous wastes - equalization and neutralization- biological degradation- recycle and 
reuse of waste effluents- treatment of industrial wastes- Dairy, Tannery, Petrochemical, Fertilizer, 
textiles, Pulp and paper 
Air pollution-effects- stack emission- automobile exhaust - control devices-solid waste Management - 
EIA. 
 
Note: Assignments include the designs and drawings of various wastewater treatment units. 
 
References 
 
1. Duggal, K.N., Elements of Environmental Engineering, S.Chand and Co., New Delhi, 2002. 
2. Birdie, G.S. and Birdie, J.S., Water Supply  and  Sanitary  Engineering,  Dhanpat Rai  and  Sons, 

New Delhi, 1992. 
3. Metcalf and Eddy, Waste Water Engineering, Collection, Treatment and Disposal, Tata McGraw 

Hill, Inc., New York, 2005. 
4. Manual of Sewage and Sewage Treatment - CPHEEO, 1999. 
 

 18 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 

 determine the sewage characteristics and design various sewage treatment plants 
 analyze the status of surface water and ground water quality and the remediation technologies 
 carry out municipal water and wastewater treatment system design and operation 
 manage hazardous wastes, risk assessment and treatment technologies 
 apply environmental treatment technologies and design processes 

 
CE303 STRUCTURAL ANALYSIS – I 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the concept of analysis of indeterminate structures by various classical methods 
 To study the use of ILD for determinate structure 
 To learn the concepts of moving loads and its effect on structures 
 To understand the concept of equivalent UDL 
 To study the reversal of stress under live load 

 
Course Content 
 
Slope deflection method - analysis of indeterminate structures- Settlement. 
Moment distribution method - analysis of indeterminate structures - settlement of supports - sway. 
Energy methods - Kani's method - analysis of indeterminate structures - settlement of supports - sway. 
Moving loads for statically determinate structures -single load - two point loads - several points loads - 
maximum bending moment and maximum shear force - equivalent u.d.l. - absolute maximum bending 
moment. 
Enveloping curves for maximum bending moment and maximum shear force and determination of 
equivalent UDL, ILD for shear, moment and reactions for statically determinate beams and pinjointed 
trusses - Reversal of stresses under live load. 
 
References 
 
1. Jindal. R.L, Indeterminate Structures, Chan Tea, New Delhi, 2000 
2. Punmia B.C., Theory of Structures, Standard Book House, New Delhi, 2000 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 use various classical methods for analysis of indeterminate structures 
 determine the effect of support settlements for indeterminate structures 
 apply the concepts of ILD and moving loads on determinate structures 
 apply the concept of equivalent UDL 
 determine the reversal of stresses in trusses using ILD 

 
 
 
 

 19 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

CE305 CONCRETE STRUCTURES – I 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To study the stress strain behavior of steel and concrete 
 To understand the concept of working stress and limit state methods 
 To gain the knowledge of limit state design for flexure, shear, torsion, bond and anchorage 
 To understand the behavior of columns subjected to eccentric load and use of interaction 

diagrams 
 To study the design of various foundation 

 
Course Content 
 
Stress strain behavior of steel and concrete- Introduction to working stress method - permissible 
stresses.  Limit state method-Limit states - Characteristic strength and load - Partial safety factor - 
Design of singly and doubly reinforced beams, T and L beams - Design for Shear and Torsion. Slabs - 
one way and two way  slabs  for  different  edge  conditions - Yield line theory -   Flat  slab  -  
continuous  slabs  -  stair cases - different types. Columns - axially loaded and eccentrically loaded 
columns - Interaction Diagrams.  Footings - isolated footings - square, rectangular and circular footings 
- Combined footing Pile and pile cap- Introduction to masonry structures. 
 
Note: Assignments include the design and drawings of various R.C.C structural elements. 
 
References 
 
1. Ashok, Kumar Jain, Reinforced Concrete Limit State Design, Nem Chand Brothers, 1990.  
2. Sinha. S.N. Reinforced Concrete Design, Tata McGraw Hill, 2002. 
3. Varghese, Limit state design of concrete, Oxford IBH, 2000. 
4. IS456-2000 Code of practice for Plain and reinforced concrete code of practice. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the fundamental concepts of working stress method and limit state method 
 use IS code of practice for the design of concrete elements 
 design the beams, slab, stairs, column and footing 
 draw various RCC structural elements 
 design masonry structures 

 
CE307 STEEL STRUCTURES-I  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To learn IS 800-2007 code of practice for the design of Compression, Tension and Flexural 
members using various cross-sections 

 To study the behaviour and design of compression and tension members using simple and 
built-up sections 

 20 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 To understand behaviour of flexural members and the design laterally restrained and 
unrestrained beams 

 To study the components of truss, loads on trusses, analysis and design of purlins and truss 
members 

 To study the design of bolted and welded connections and arranging field visit to industries 
 
Course Content 
 
Introduction to steel structures and IS800-2007- Material specifications - Rolled sections – Section 
classifications - Permissible stresses in tension, compression, bending and shear.   
Compression members - Slenderness ratio – Design - Simple and built- up sections - lacings and 
battens - Tension members. 
Flexural members – Rolled sections - built-up beams - Design for strength and serviceability, web 
crippling, web yielding, bearing stiffeners. 
Roof trusses - components - Loads - Design of purlins using channel and angle sections, and truss 
members - End connections at the supports. 
Bolted connections - types of bolts - Resistance of bolted connections under various failure modes – 
design of beam splice, seated shear connections at the supports. 
Welded connections - types - strength of welds - design of fillet and butt welds - shear and moment 
resistant joints - design and detailing of connections. 
 
Note: Assignments include the design and drawings of various steel structural elements. 
 
References 
 
1. Subramanian N, Design of Steel Structures, Oxford University Press, New Delhi 2008. 
2. Dayaratnam P, Design of Steel Structures, S. Chand & Co., New Delhi, 2003. 
3. Arya, A.S and Ajmani, A.L., Design of Steel Structures, Nemchand and brothers, Roorkee, 1992.. 
4. Punmia, B.C., Ashok Kumar Jain and Arun Kumar Jain. Comprehensive Design of Steel Structures, 

Laxmi Publications Pvt. Ltd., New Delhi 2000. 
5. IS 800-2007, Code of practice for general construction in steel, Bureau of Indian Standards, New 

Delhi. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the IS code of practice  for the design of steel structural elements 
 design compression and tension members using simple and built-up sections 
 calculate forces on the various members of the truss and design them 
 analyze the behavior of bolted connections and design them 
 design welded connections for both axial and eccentric forces 

 
CE309 HYDRAULIC MACHINERY 
 
Course objectives: 
 
 To understand the application of momentum principle of impact of jets on plane and curved 

surfaces 

 21 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 To study types of centrifugal Pumps, work done and efficiency of the different types centrifugal 
pumps and also study about performance of pumps & characteristic curves 

  To study about specific speed and performance characteristics of different types of turbines 
 To study about hydroelectric power plant and estimation of hydropower potential 
 To explain the concept of positive displacement 

 
Course Content 
 
Principles of impingement of jets - Impact of jet on a stationary vertical plate, stationary inclined plate, 
stationary curved plate, hinged plate, moving vertical and inclined plates, moving curved plate and on 
series of moving flat and curved vanes fixed on the periphery of circular rim. 
Turbines - classification- impulse turbines - Pelton wheel - Reaction turbines - Francis and Kaplan 
Turbines - draft tubes - Governing of a Francis turbine - Performance of turbines -  specific speed and 
their significance. 
Centrifugal pump - description and working - Head, discharge and efficiency of a centrifugal pump - 
pressure rise in the pump - minimum starting speed of a pump - cavitation -   priming - multistage 
pumps - characteristic curves. 
Reciprocating pump  - Description and  working  -  types  -  discharge  and  slip - power required to 
drive  the  pump  - Indicator  diagram - Air  vessel - work done  against friction  with and without air 
vessels. 
Working principle and use of the following hydraulic pumps and machines - Deep well pumps - 
submersible and jet pumps, special pumps - Gear pump - screw pump, sewage pump, miscellaneous 
machines - Hydraulic press - hydraulic accumulator - Hydraulic ram.     
   
References 
 
1. Bansal, R.K., A text book of Fluid Mechanics and Hydraulic Machines, Laxmi Publications (P) Ltd., 

New Delhi, 2002. 
2. Nagaratnam, S., Fluid Machines and Systems, Tata McGraw Hill, 1989.  
3. Khurmi, R.S., Text Book of Hydraulics and Hydraulic Machine, S. Chand & Co, 2003.  
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 calculate forces and work done by a jet on fixed or moving plate and curved plates 
 apply the working principles of Impulse and Reaction turbines 
 select the type of turbine required with reference to available head of water and discharge 
 determine the characteristics of centrifugal pump 
 apply the working principles of the Reciprocating pump 

 
CE311 ADVANCED STRENGTH OF MATERIALS 
 

Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the mechanical properties of materials 
 To understand the different theories of failure for brittle and ductile materials 
 To know the features of unsymmetrical bending and different methods of analysis 
 To understand the concept of shear centre and to know different methods for its location 
 To know the fundamentals of vibration of structure 

 22 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course Content 
 
Mechanical Properties of Materials - Stress-Strain Diagrams- Elastic and Plastic Deformation - Brittle 
and Ductile Failures of Materials - Mechanical Tests like Surface Hardness, Fatigue, Creep etc. 
Principal stresses in a 3D field.-  Computation -Mohr's Circle - Lame's Ellipsoid. Theories of failure - 
Criteria for Failure - Different failure theories for ductile and brittle materials. Equivalent bending and 
twisting moments. 
Unsymmetrical bending- Properties of unsymmetrical sections- Circle of inertia - Dyadic circle - 
Momental ellipse- Stresses and deflection due to unsymmetrical bending - Concept and relevance of  Z 
polygon.  
Shear Centre - Concept and significance - Shear flow for thin walled open sections-Location of shear 
centre for singly symmetric sections. Stresses in curved flexural members-Winkler Bach Formula - 
Crane hooks - rings and links. 
Fundamentals of vibration - free vibration of single degree of freedom systems - Undamped and 
damped free vibration with different types of damping.- Resonance-Harmonic response  of single 
degree of freedom systems with and without damping.  
 
References 
 
1. Srinath, L. S., Advanced Mechanics of Solids , Tata McGraw Hill,1980. 
2. Kazimi, S.M.A., Solid Mechanics, Tata McGraw Hill, 1976. 
3. Punmia, B.C., Strength of Materials Part II, Standard Publishers and Distributors, 1991.  
4. Shames I.H., Engineering Mechanics, Prentice Hall of India,1996 
 
Course outcomes:  
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 determine the important mechanical properties of materials 
 demonstrate the different theories of failure for brittle and ductile materials 
 apply the different methods of unsymmetrical bending analysis 
 demonstrate the significance and concept of shear centre 
 apply the principles of structural dynamics 

 
CE313 FLUID MECHANICS LAB 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the flow measurement in a pipe flow 
 To determine the energy loss in pipe flow 
 To study the characteristics of turbines 
 To study the characteristics of pumps 
 To measure the discharge in a open channel flow 

 
Course Content 
 
1. Determination of pipe friction 
2. Calibration of flow meters - Venturimeter and Orifice meter 
3. Determination of discharge coefficients for notches 
4. Determination of minor losses 

 23 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

5. Pressure gauge calibration. 
6. Centrifugal pump 
7. Submersible pump 
8. Reciprocating pump 
9. Jet pump 
10. Gear pump 
11. Screw pump 
12. Francis Turbine 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 measure discharge in pipes 
 determine the energy loss in conduits 
 demonstrate the characteristics curves of pumps 
 demonstrate the characteristics curves of turbines 
 carry out discharge measurements in open channel 

 
CE315 ENVIRONMENTAL ENGINEERING LAB 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To quantify the water and wastewater pollutant 
 To measure the concentration of air pollutants 
 To analyze the characteristics of water, wastewater and ambient air 
 To study the growth of microorganism and its quantification 

 
Course Content 
 
1. Physical characteristics of water  
2. Chemical characteristics of water  
3. Bacteriological tests   
4. Microscopic tests  
5. Jar test   
6. Chlorine demand and residual test 
7. Total solids and settleable solids.  
8. Organic and inorganic solids.  
9. Determination of pH and chemical constituents like Cl-, Fe2+ etc. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 quantify the pollutant concentration in water, wastewater and ambient air 
 recommend the degree of treatment required for the water and wastewater 
 analyze the survival conditions for the microorganism and its growth rate 

 
 

 24 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

SEMESTER VI 
 
CE302 STRUCTURAL ANALYSIS – II 
 
Course objectives : 
 

 To understand the influence line concepts for indeterminate structures 
 To understand the methods of analysis of intermediate trusses for external loads, lack of fit and 

thermal effect 
 To study behaviour of arches and their methods of analysis 
 To know the concept and analysis of cable stayed bridge 
 To study the multi storey frames subjected to gravity loads and lateral loads 

 
Course Content 
 
Influence lines - Maxwell Betti's theorem - Muller Breslau's principle and its application. Influence lines 
for continuous beams and single bay, single storey portals with prismatic members.  
Analysis of plane truss with one or two redundants - trusses with lack of fit - Thermal stresses - 
Settlement of supports - Trussed beams.  
Theory of arches - Analysis of three hinged, two hinged and fixed arches - influence lines, rib 
shortening, settlement and temperature effects. 
Analysis of cables - Suspension bridges with three and two hinged stiffening girders - influence lines.  
Analysis of multistorey frames for gravity and lateral loads by approximate methods - Substitute frame - 
Portal and Cantilever methods.  
  
References 
 
1. Punmia, B.C, Theory of Structures, Laxmi Publications, 2000. 
2. Timoshenko, S.P.,Young, D.H., Theory of Structures, Tata McGraw Hill, 1983. 
3. Wang. C.K., Intermediate Structural Analysis, International Text Book Co, 1983.  
4. Hibbeler. R.C., Structural Analysis, Pearson Education (Singapore) Ptc. Ltd., Indian Branch, 2002. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 demonstrate the concepts of qualitative influence line diagram for continuous beams and 
frames 

 apply the methods of indeterminate truss analysis 
 demonstrate the behavior of arches and their methods of analysis 
 analyze cable suspension bridges 
 analyze multistory frames subjected to gravity loads and lateral loads 

 
CE304 TRANSPORTATION ENGINEERING - I   
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the importance of transportation and characteristics of road transport 
 To know about the history of highway development, surveys and classification of roads 

 25 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 To study about the geometric design of highways 
 To study about traffic characteristics and design of intersections  
 To know about the pavement materials and design 

 
Course Content 
 
Introduction: Importance of transportation, different modes of transportation, characteristics of road 
transport, scope of highway and traffic engineering 
Highway development and planning: Importance, classification of roads, road patterns, planning 
surveys; highway alignment and surveys 
Highway Geometric Design: Cross section elements, sight distance, design of horizontal and vertical 
alignment 
Traffic Engineering: Traffic characteristics - Traffic studies-speed, volume, speed and delay, origin-
destination, parking and accident studies; capacity of urban roads and highways; traffic operations- 
regulation and control; design of intersections- at grade and grade separated 
Pavement Materials and Design: Specifications and tests on pavement materials, pavement design 
factors, design of flexible and rigid pavements as per IRC. 
 
References 
 
1. Khanna, S.K and Justo, C.E.G., Highway Engineering, Nem Chand and Bros. 
2. Kadiyali, L.R, Traffic Engineering and Transport Planning, Khanna Publishers, New Delhi 
3. Kadiyali, Principles of Highway Engineering, Khanna Publishers. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 carry out surveys involved in planning and highway alignment 
 design cross section elements, sight distance, horizontal and vertical alignment 
 implement traffic studies, traffic regulations and control, and intersection design 
 determine the characteristics of pavement materials  
 design flexible and rigid pavements as per IRC 

 
CE306 CONCRETE STRUCTURES – II 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the design concept of various structures and detailing of reinforcements 
 To understand the design of underground and elevated liquid retaining structures 
 To study the design of material storage structures 
 To know the effect of temperature on concrete structures 
 To study the design of bridges subjected to IRC loading 

 
Course Content 
 
Earth Retaining structures - Retaining walls- types - cantilever and counterfort - design - drainage and 
other construction details. Liquid Retaining structure - Water tanks - types - square, rectangular, circular 
- Design of underground and elevated tanks - design of staging - spherical & conical roof for circular 

 26 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

tanks. Material storage structures - Determination of lateral pressure on side walls of bunker - 
Rankine's theory - design of bunker - design of circular silo using Jansen's theory. Environmental 
Structures - Chimneys - Principles and Design - Design of long columns. Transportation structures - 
Bridges - Slab  bridge - Design of single span slab bridge  -  Tee  beam bridge - Design of Tee beam 
bridge with stiffness - Tee beam  bridge  with  cross  girders  
 
Note:  Assignments include the design and drawings of various RCC structures. 
 
References 
 
1. Vazirani, V.N., and Ratwani, Concrete Structures, Vol. IV, Khanna Publishers, New Delhi, 1995. 
2. Dayaratnam, P., Design of Reinforced Concrete Structures, Oxford & IBH Publishers & Co., New 

Delhi, 2005. 
3. Victor, D.J., Essentials of Bridge Engineering, Oxford & IBH Publishers Co., Newdelhi, 1991. 
4. IS456-2006 Code of practice for Plain and reinforced concrete code of practice. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the concepts of liquid  retaining structures 
 design material storage structures using various theories 
 apply the concepts of environmental and transportation structures 
 demonstrate the detailing of reinforcement 
 draw the various RCC structures 

 
CE308 STEEL STRUCTURES-II  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To introduce the concept of plastic analysis 
 To study the behaviour and design of compression member subjected to eccentric force and 

design of base plate 
 To study the design of Gantry girder, welded plate girder, stiffeners and connections 
 To calculate the wind forces on steel stacks as per IS 875 and  design the self supporting steel 

stacks  including   base plate and anchor bolts 
 To study the behaviour and design of light gauge steel sections 

 
Course Content 
 
Eccentrically loaded column - simple and compound section - lacings and battens - column bases – 
slab base – gusseted base – moment resistant base plate  
Welded plate girders – analysis and design using IS800-2007 - curtailment of flange plates –stiffeners – 
analysis and design of gantry girder 
Introduction to IS875 part (3) – assessment of wind load – analysis and design of steel stacks - 
functional and structural requirements - self supporting and guyed stacks - base plate and anchor bolt 
Light gauge steel sections-types of cross section - Local and post buckling - Effective width concept- 
Compression and Flexural members. 

 27 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Introduction to Plastic analysis – ductility – plastic bending of beams – stages of bending – shape factor 
– plastic hinge – load factor – failure mechanism - upper and lower bound theorems of plastic analysis 
– collapse load for beams and frames.   
 
Note: Assignments include the design and drawings of various steel structures. 
 
References 
 
1. Subramanian N, Design of Steel Structures, Oxford University Press, New Delhi 2008. 
2. Bhavikatti, S.S., Design of Steel Structures, I.K. International Publishing House Pvt. Ltd., New 

Delhi, 2010 
3. Krishnaraju.N, Structural Design and Drawing, University Press, Hyderabad, 2009. 
4. IS 800-2007, Code of practice for general construction in steel, Bureau of Indian Standards, New 

Delhi. 
5. IS875 Part (3) - 1987, Code of Practice for Design Loads (other than earthquake) for buildings and 

structures: Wind loads., Bureau of Indian Standards, New Delhi. 
6. SP6 (1)-1964, IS hand book for structural Engineers. Bureau of Indian Standards, New Delhi. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 calculate shape factor and plastic moment capacity 
 design eccentrically loaded compression members (Beam-Columns) and their base plates 
 design welded plate girder and other components and Gantry girder 
 carry out wind load calculations for tall structures and design of steel chimneys 
 design light gauge steel sections 

 
CE310 WATER RESOURCES ENGINEERING 
      
Course Objectives: 
 

 To build on the student’s background in hydrology and hydraulics and understanding of water 
resources systems 

 To develop the skills in modeling  of flood flows and flood routing  
 To develop skills in the ground water flow, type of aquifer and yield from the well 
 To provide the knowledge of design of reservoir, operation and sedimentation 
 To study the effect, causes and remedial measures of water logging 

 
Course Content 
 
Hydrologic cycle - rainfall and its measurement - computation of mean rainfall over a catchment area 
using arithmetic mean, Theissen polygon and Isohyetal methods - Runoff -infiltration indices - Storm 
Hydrograph and unit hydrograph 
River regions and their characteristics - classification of rivers on alluvial plains - meandering of rivers - 
river training 
Reservoir planning - Investigations - zones of storage in a reservoir - single purpose and multipurpose 
reservoir - determination of storage capacity and yield - reservoir sedimentation -   Reservoir life - 
Sediment prevention - Flood estimation- Flood forecasting - Flood routing 

 28 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Ground water - types of aquifers - storage coefficient - coefficient of transmissibility - steady radial flow 
into a well located in an unconfined and confined aquifers - Tube wells and Open wells - yield from an 
open well. 
Water logging - causes and effects of water logging - remedial measures - land reclamation - land 
drainage - benefits - classification of drains - surface drains - subsurface drains - design principles and 
maintenance of drainage systems. 
 
References 
 
1. Punmia, B.C., Irrigation and Water Power Engineering, Standard Publishers, 2001. 
2. Ragunath. H.M., Hydrology, Willey Eastern Limited, New Delhi, 2000. 
3. Subramanya, Engineering Hydrology, Tata-McGraw Hill, 2004. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 design various channel systems 
 design head and cross regulator structures 
 identify various types of reservoir and their design aspects 
 By the Establishes the understanding of cross drainage works and its design  
 design different types of dams 

 
CE312 COMPUTER AIDED DESIGN – I 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To learn the programming of numerical methods 
  To use the computer to apply numerical techniques 
 To learn the fundamentals of Computer Aided Drafting 
 To understand DBMS concepts 
 To learn the handling of spreadsheets 

 
Course Content 
 
Application Programs  
 

a. Roots of an equation using Newton - Raphson method. 
b.  Solution of linear simultaneous equations using Gauss elimination. 
c. Matrix inversion using Gauss Jordan method 
d. Linear regression line of given points 
e. Curve fitting using Polynomial Regression 
f. Eigen value extraction using Power method 

Standard packages to solve the above problems-Solution of Linear Programming problems using   
standard software-Basic 2D objects -  line, polyline, circle, ellipse - editing objects - trim, break, change, 
stretch - dimensioning - preparation of plan, elevation and section drawings of simple structural objects 
- printing and plotting drawings - script files - introduction to 3D 
DBMS concepts - Civil Engineering Databases - Manipulation - Spreadsheet concepts - Worksheet 
calculations in Civil Engineering - Regression, Matrix  Inversion, etc. 
 

 29 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

References 
 
1. Chapra, S.C., and Canale R.P., Numerical Methods for Engineers, McGraw-Hill, 2004 
2. Rajasekaran, S., Numerical Methods in Science and Engineering A Practical Approach, 

A.H.Wheeler and Co, 2005. 
3. Ronald W., Leigh, AutoCAD: A Concise Guide to Commands and Features, Galgotia Publications, 

2004. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 develop programs for numerical methods 
 solve numerical techniques in computer 
 implement Computer Aided Drafting 
 apply DBMS concepts to Civil Engineering 
 apply Spreadsheet calculations to Civil Engineering 

 
CE314 ESTIMATION, COSTING AND VALUATION 
Course objectives: 
 

 To know the importance of preparing the types of estimates under different conditions 
 To know about the rate analysis and bill preparations 
 To study about the specification writing 
 To understand the valuation of land and buildings 

Course Content 
 
Preparation of detailed estimates - Preparation of specifications report accompanying the estimate 
Approximate methods of Costing - types of estimate -  costing  for  various structures - rate analysis - 
rate  for  material  and  labour  -  schedule of rates -data  sheets  -  abstract  estimate. Values and its 
kinds  -  Valuation  -  purpose- scope -  methods - land and building  method - Factors affecting the 
value of plot and building  -  depreciation  -  Valuation of residential building with case study. 
 
References 
 
1. Dutta, Estimating and Costing in Civil Engineering, S. Datta & Co, 2002. 
2. Bhasin, P.L., Quantity Surveying, 2nd Edition, S.Chand & Co., 2000. 

 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply different types of estimates in different situations 
 carry out analysis of rates and bill preparation at different locations 
 demonstrate the concepts of specification writing 
 carry out valuation of assets 

 
 

 

 30 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

SEMESTER VII 
 
CE401 MATRIX METHODS OF STRUCTURAL ANALYSIS 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the importance of degrees of freedom and the concept of principle of 
superposition 

 To know about the concept of strain energy and principle of virtual work 
 To study the transformation of system matrices and element matrices for the determinate and 

indeterminate structures 
 To analyze the forces in structures like continuous beam, truss and frames using stiffness and 

flexibility method 
 To understand the behavior of structures due to thermal expansion and lack of fit 

 
Course Content 
 
Generalized measurements - Degrees of freedom - Constrained  Measurements  -  Behavior  of  
structures  -  Principle  of  superposition. Stiffness and flexibility matrices - Constrained measurements - 
Stiffness and flexibility coefficients from virtual work. 
Strain  energy  -  Stiffness and  flexibility  matrices  from strain  energy - Symmetry and other properties  
of  stiffness  and flexibility matrices - Betti's law and its  applications - Strain energy in systems and in 
elements. 
Determinate and indeterminate structures - Transformation  of element  matrices  to  system matrices  -  
Transformation  of system  vectors to element vectors - Normal  coordinates  and     orthogonal 
transformations. 
Flexibility  method  applied to  statically  determinate  and  indeterminate  structures - Choice  of   
redundants  -  Transformation of redundants - Internal forces due to thermal expansion and lack of fit. 
Development  of the method - Internal forces due  to  thermal expansion  and  lack  of fit  -  Application 
to symmetrical structures - Comparison  between  stiffness  and flexibility methods. 
 
References 
 
1. Moshe, F., Rubenstein, Matrix Computer Analysis of Structures, Prentice Hall, New York, 1986. 
2. Rajasekaran S, Computational Structural Mechanics, Prentice Hall of India, New Delhi, 2001 
3. Manickaselvam V.K., Elements of Matrix and Stability Analysis of Structures, Khanna Publishers, 

New Delhi, 1998. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the basic concepts of matrix methods in structural analysis 
 develop stiffness and flexibility matrices 
 analyze the structures using flexibility and stiffness method 
 transform system coordinates to element coordinates 
 determine the forces in various members due to lack of fit and thermal expansion 

 
 
 

 31 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

CE403 TRANSPORTATION ENGINEERING - II   
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To know about the basics and design of various components of railway engineering 
 To study about the types and functions of track, junctions and railway stations 
 To learn about the aircraft characteristics, planning and components of airport 
 To study about the types and components of docks and harbours 
 To know about various urban transportation systems and Intelligent Transportation Systems 

 
Course Content 
 
Railway Engineering - Location surveys and alignment - Permanent way - Gauges - Components - 
Functions and requirements - Geometric design 
Track Junctions-Points and crossings - types and functions - design and layout - simple problems - 
Railway stations and yards. Signaling and interlocking - control systems of train movements. 
Airport Engineering-Aircraft characteristics - Airport obstructions and zoning - Runway - taxiways and 
aprons- Terminal area planning 
Docks and Harbours - Types - Layout and planning principles- breakwaters - docks- wharves and 
quays - Transit sheds- warehouses- navigation aids. 
Urban transportation systems - Bus transit - Mass Rapid Transit System - Light Rail Transit. Transport 
economics and Financing - Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) 
 
References 
 
1. M.M. Agarwal, Railway Engineering, Prabha & Co. 2007. 
2. Khanna, S.K. and Arora, M.G.  Airport Planning and Design, Nemchand and Bros. 1999. 
3. Oza and Oza, Elements of Dock and Harbour Engineering, Charotar Publishing House, 1996. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 carry out the surveys for railways, airports and harbours 
 perform geometric design for the three modes 
 plan the layout of different types of terminals 
 apply the principles of bus transit, MRTS and LRT 
 demonstrate the fundamentals of Intelligent Transportation Systems 

 
CE405 IRRIGATION AND HYDRAULIC STRUCTURES 
 
 Course Objectives: 
 

 To understand the basic types of irrigation, irrigation standards and crop water assessment 
 To study the different aspects of design of hydraulic structures 
 To provide knowledge on various hydraulic structures such as energy dissipaters, head and 

cross regulators, canal falls and structures involved in cross drainage works 
 To understand the analysis of seepage and hydraulic jump 
 To design different types of dams 

 32 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course Content 
 
Irrigation - necessity - Types of irrigation - Methods of supplying water - Assessment  of  irrigation water 
- Consumptive use   and  its determination - water  requirement  of various crops - Duty - Delta - Base 
period and crop period. 
Functions and components of a diversion head work - Function - selection of site - type  of weirs  on  
pervious  foundations  -  cause of failure  -  Bligh's  creep theory   and Khosla's theory - complete 
design of a  vertical drop weir. 
Gravity dams - Non overflow section - forces acting - stability rules - elementary  profile  - Low and High  
dams  -  drainage  gallery  -  Construction  joints  -  Earthen  dams  -  stability of  slopes by  slip circle 
method - seepage analysis and its  control  
Types  of canals - canal alignment - Kennedy's silt theory  -  Lacey's  silt  theory - Design of canals 
using the above theories - economical  depth  of  cutting  -  canal  losses - canal     maintenance - lined 
canals and their design - silt  control  measures.  
Canal  falls - Necessity and location - Design of  sand  type  fall  - design of a cross regulator - cross 
drainage works  - selection of  suitable  type  of  cross  drainage  work -  canal outlets. 
 
Note: Assignments include the design and drawings of various irrigation structures.  
 
References 
 
1. Punmia, B.C., Irrigation and Water Power Engineering, Standard Publishers, 2001. 
2. Garg, S.K., Irrigation and Hydraulics Structures, Khanna Publishers, 1992. 
3. Sharma, S.K., Principles and Practice of Irrigation Engg, S.Chand & Co, 1984. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 assess the irrigation needs of crops 
 design weirs on pervious foundation 
 design gravity dam and earthen dam 
 design the canal systems 
 select and design canal fall 

 
HM401 INDUSTRIAL ECONOMICS 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To introduce the students to economic theories and their role in decision making in the 
corporate world 

 To familiarize the students with microeconomics and macroeconomics theories  
 To enable the students have a clear understanding of the real-world causes and effects of 

various market structures  
 To equip the students with necessary economic tools to analyse the price and output 

determination in companies  
 To familiarize fiscal and monetary policy responses to macroeconomic instabilities such as 

unemployment, inflation and economic growth 
 
 

 33 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course Content 
 
Demand and Supply - Forecasting techniques  
Cost and Revenues -Competitive nature of the firms - Keynesian economics - National Income 
Trade cycle - Inflation - Index numbers Capital budgeting - Impact of Liberalization, Privatization and 
Globalization - Locating the firm in a global economy 
Fiscal Policy - Taxation - Principles. Monetary policy - Functions of banks - Credit creation by 
commercial banks.  
 
References 
 
1. Manb, Adhikari, Business Economics, Excel books. 
2. Mishra S.K and Purin V.K, Economic Environment of business, HPH. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply economic theories 
 compare microeconomic and macroeconomic theories 
 determine price, output and profit in the market structure 
 apply appropriate tools and frameworks to analyse the different aspect of industry and market 

conditions 
 evaluate fiscal and monetary policy responses to macroeconomic instabilities 

 
CE407 COMPUTER AIDED DESIGN – II 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To learn the software developing skills for structural design 
 To understand the computing techniques in the field of transportation 
 To gain knowledge in networking and flowcharts in water resources 
 To understand the computing skills in the field of geotechnical engineering 
 To study the different software packages for analysis and design 

 
Course Content 
 
R.C.C: Slabs - Beams- Columns - Retaining walls.  
Steel: Trusses - Beams - Columns - Column Bases - Plate girders - Gantry girders - Connections.  
Transportation planning process- Trip generation and distribution- Network   analysis - Shortest path 
algorithms.  
Water resources - Pipe networks - Canal design - Backwater profile - Synthetic derivation of stream 
flows using random numbers - Dam stability  
Analysis and design packages in Structural Engineering, Transportation Engineering, Water Resources 
Engineering and Geotechnical Engineering 
 
References 
 
1. Krishnamoorthy, C.S. and Rajeev, S., Computer Aided Design and Analytical Tools, Narosa, 1993.  
2. Papacostas, C.S., Fundamentals of Transportation Engineering Prentice-Hall of India, 2001. 

 34 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

3. Loucks, D.P., Stedinger, J.R. and Haith, D.A., Water Resource Systems Planning and Analysis, 
Prentice-Hall INC, 1981. 

 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the software skills in the design of infrastructure 
 apply computing techniques to transportation engineering 
 analyze water resource networks 
 apply computing skills to geotechnical engineering 
 run various software packages 

 
SEMESTER VIII 

 
MB491 MANAGEMENT CONCEPTS & PRACTICES 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To enrich the students with the concepts and applications of Management 
 To make the learners understand the basic functions of Financial Management 
 To facilitate the students with the fundamental concepts of Technology management 
 To enhance the understanding of Project Management techniques 
 To impart the importance of Human Resources in the organizational context 

 
Course Content 
 
Introduction to management- Evolution of Scientific and Modern Management Principles-Functions of 
Management-Types of Business Organization – Managerial Roles – Levels of Management. 
Decision Making. Nature Purpose and Steps involved in Planning. Objectives – Strategies and Planning 
Premises. Nature and purpose of Organizing. Formal and informal Organization. Span of control – 
Delegation of Authority. 
Introduction to Human Resource Management. Creativity and Innovation. Motivation theories 
(Hierarchy of Needs by Maslow, Herzberg’s Two-Factor theory) – Motivational Techniques – Monetary 
& Non-monetary, Job Enrichment. 
Types of Leadership – Leadership Theories. Communication – Process of Communication – Barriers 
and Breakdown- Effective Communication. 
System and process of Controlling – Requirements for effective control – The budget as control 
Technique. Globalization and Liberalization – International Management and Global Theory of 
Management, Corporate Social Responsibility. 
 
References 
 
1. Harold Kooritz & Heinz Weihrich “Essentials of Management”, Tata McGraw-Hill. 
2. L.M. Prasad, Principles of Management , Sultan Chand  & sons, New Delhi. 
3. Sherlekar & sherlekar, Principles of Management, Himalaya Publishing House, New Delhi. 
4. Stephen Robbins, Organizational Behavior, Pearson Education, New Delhi. 
 
 
 

 35 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 demonstrate the nuances of management functions 
 analyze the framework of a business organization 
 adopt an empirical approach toward business situations 
 apply various Project Management techniques 
 implement roles of team players 

 
CE402 PRESTRESSED CONCRETE STRUCTURES 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To learn the principles, materials, methods and systems of prestressing 
 To know the different types of losses and deflection of prestressed members 
 To learn the design of prestressed concrete beams for flexural, shear and tension and to 

calculate ultimate flexural strength of beam 
 To learn the design of anchorage zones, composite beams, analysis and design of continuous 

beam 
 To learn the design of water tanks 

 
Course Content 
 
Principles of prestressing - Materials of prestressing - Systems of prestressing - Loss of prestress - 
Deflection of Prestressed Concrete members. 
Slabs  - Pre-tensioned and Post-tensioned beams - Design  for  flexure,  bond  and  shear - IS code  
provisions  -  Ultimate  flexural and shear strength of prestressed concrete  sections - Design of end 
anchorage zones using IS code method. 
Composite beams - Analysis and design.Partial prestressing - non-prestressed reinforcements. 
Analysis of Continuous beams - Cable layout - Linear transformation - Concordant cables. 
Design of compression members and tension members. Circular prestressing - Water tanks - Pipes - 
Analysis and design - IS Codal provisions. 
 
References 
 
1. Lin. T.Y., Burns, N.H., Design of Prestressed Concrete Structures, John Wiley & Sons, 1982. 
2. RajaGopalan N. Prestressed Concrete, Narosa Publishing House, New Delhi, 2002. 

 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 design a prestressed concrete beam accounting for losses 
 design the anchorage zone for post tensioned members 
 design composite members 
 design continuous beams 
 design water tanks 

 

 36 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

ELECTIVES  
 
CE352 GROUND WATER HYDROLOGY 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To know the types of aquifers 
 To understand the surface and subsurface investigation in detail 
 To integrate the fundamental and basic knowledge of ground water movement 
 To understand the process of sea water intrusion and recharge 
 To introduce the different model studies 

 
Course Content 
 
Groundwater occurrence – distribution – aquifer – types - Surface investigation - Geophysical - 
electrical resistivity - Seismic refraction - Gravity and magnetic - Geologic - Air photo interpretation - 
Dowsing. 
Subsurface investigation - test drilling - resistivity logging- potential logging - temperature and caliper 
logging. 
Steady unidirectional flow - well in a uniform flow - steady flow with uniform recharge - unsteady radial 
flow to a well - well flow near aquifer boundaries - Multiple well systems - partially penetrating wells - 
characteristic well losses.    
Secular and seasonal variations - Fluctuations due to evapo-transpiration, Meteorological phenomena, 
tides, external loads and earthquakes - control by drains and wells. 
Recharge through sewage pits, shafts and wells.  
Occurrence of sea water intrusion - Ghypon-Heizberg relation between fresh and saline waters - shape 
length and structure of the fresh salt water interface - prevention and control of seawater  intrusion  - 
role of sea water in  ground  water  -  coastal zoning. 
Sand models - Electrical models - Viscous fluid models - membrane models - numerical analysis 
methods  
 
References 
 
1. Raghunath H.M., Ground Water Hydrology, New-Age International, 2nd Edition, 1990. 

 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 identify types of aquifers 
 carry out surface and subsurface investigation to locate groundwater 
 visualise the occurrence and movement of groundwater  
  select suitable type of ground water recharge 
 assess sea water intrusion and its control 

 
CE451 EXPERIMENTAL STRESS ANALYSIS 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To study the working principles of different types of strain gauges 

 37 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 To understand the model analysis 
 To know the fundamentals of photo elastic coatings 
 To study the effects of 2-D photo elasticity 
 To study the working principle of load, pressure and displacement transducers 

 
Course Content 
 
Strain gauges – Mechanical, optical, acoustic, electrical inductance and capacitance pneumatic types – 
description and working principles 
Electrical resistance strain gauges, gauge characteristics and types – Equipment for recording static 
strain – reduction of strain gauge data.   
Load, pressure and displacement transducers. 
Model analysis – direct and indirect models – law of structural similitude – choice of scales – Model 
materials – limitations of model studies –Buckingham PI theorem – design of direct and indirect models 
– Beggs deformeter and its applications. 
Two dimensional photo – elasticity – optical principles stress optic law – Methods of producing isoclines 
and isochromatics using polariscopes – Methods of measuring fractional fringe orders – model 
materials – separation techniques 
Fundamental of Photo elastic coatings, Moire fringe and brittle coating techniques – Introduction to 
stress freezing techniques – Introduction to non-destructive testings 
 
References 
 
1. Daley and Riley, Experimental Stress Analysis, McGraw Hill Book Company, 1987 
2. Srinath, L.S. et al., Experimental Stress Analysis, Tata McGraw Hill 1984. 
3. Hetenyi, M., Hand Book of Experimental Stress Analysis, John Wiley & Sons. Inc New York. 1980. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 identify the different types of strain gauges 
 carry out model analysis 
 apply the concepts of photo elastic coatings 
 analyze the behavior of 2-D photo elasticity 
 apply the working principles of transducers 

 
CE452 EARTHQUAKE RESISTANT STRUCTURES 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To introduce the basics of Earthquake Engineering 
 To introduce the engineering seismology, building geometrics & characteristics, structural 

irregularities,  
 To introduce tips on earthquake engineering - do’s and don’ts 
 To introduce cyclic loading behaviour of RC, steel and pre-stressed concrete elements 
 To discuss code provisions and their application on different types of structures 

 
 

 38 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course Content 
 
Elements of Engineering Seismology - Theory of Vibrations -Indian Seismicity -Earthquake History - 
Behavior of structures in the past Earthquakes. 
Seismic Design Concepts - Cyclic loading behavior of RC, Steel and Prestressed Concrete elements - 
Response Spectrum- Design spectrum - capacity based design. 
Provision of Seismic Code frames, shear walls, Braced frames, Combinations - Torsion. 
Performance of Regular Buildings 3D Computer Analysis of Building Systems (Theory only) - Design 
and Detailing of frames - Shear walls and Frame walls. 
Seismic performance - Irregular Buildings -Soil performance, Modern Concepts - Base Isolation - 
Adoptive systems - Case studies. 
 
References 
 
1. Pankaj Agarwal and Manish ShriKhande, Earthquake Resistant Design of Structures, Prentice- Hall 

of India, New Delhi, 2003. 
2. Bullen K.E., Introduction to the Theory of Seismology, Great Britain at the University Printing 

houses, Cambridge University Press 1996. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the basics of Earthquake Engineering 
 demonstrate the dynamics of structural system under earthquake load 
 analyze the influence of the structural / geometrical design in building characteristics 
 demonstrate the cyclic loading behaviour of RC steel and pre-stressed concrete elements 
 apply codal provisions on different types of structures 

 
CE453 REMOTE SENSING AND GIS  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To know about the principles of remote sensing and spectral signatures 
 To know about satellites, types of remote sensing and digital image processing 
 To study about the history and components of GIS 
 To study about data types and operations 
 To know the applications of remote sensing and GIS 

 
Course Content 
 
Remote Sensing – Principle - Electro-magnetic energy, spectrum - EMR interaction with atmosphere – 
Atmospheric Windows and its Significance – EMR interaction with Earth Surface Materials – Spectral 
Signature and Spectral Signature curves for water, soil and Earth Surface. 
Satellites - Classification – Satellite Sensors – satellite and sensor parameters -  Resolution – Types of 
Remote Sensing - Visual Interpretation of Satellite Images – Digital Image processing – Characteristics 
of different platforms: Landsat, SPOT, IRS series, IKONOS, QUICKBIRD – Radar, LIDAR, SAR, 
MODIS, AMSRE, Sonar remote sensing systems. 

 39 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

GIS - History of Development - Components of GIS – Hardware, Software and Organizational Context – 
Data – Spatial and Non-Spatial – Data Input Sources–– DBMS – Data Output - Data models - Raster 
and Vector data structures – Data compression – Raster vs. vector comparison 
Analysis using Raster and Vector data – Operations – Overlaying - Buffering – Modelling in GIS - Digital 
Terrain Modelling, Analysis and application – Products of DEMs and their uses – Sources of errors in 
GIS and their elimination 
Applications of Remote Sensing and GIS – Advanced applications of GIS – Disaster management, 
Water resource, Landuse – Land cover – Urban planning - Intelligent Transport Systems - Development 
of  Resources Information Systems.  
 
References 
 
1. Burrough P.A. and Rachel A. McDonell, Principles of Geographical Information Systems, Oxford 

Publication, 2004. 
2. C.P. Lo and Albert K. W. Yeung, Concepts and Techniques of Geographical Information Systems, 

Prentice- Hall India, 2006. 
3. Thomas. M. Lillesand and Ralph. W. Kiefer, Remote Sensing and Image Interpretation, John Wiley 

and Sons, 2003. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 demonstrate the concepts of Electro Magnetic energy, spectrum and spectral signature curves 
 apply the concepts of satellite and sensor parameters and characteristics of different platforms 
 apply the concepts of DBMS in GIS  
 analyze raster and vector data and modelling in GIS 
 apply GIS in land use, disaster management, ITS and resource information system 

 
CE454 ADVANCED FOUNDATION ENGINEERING 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To explain the analysis of sheet pile wall under different support conditions 
 To explain overall stability analysis of well foundation  
 To explain fundamentals of soil dynamics and its application to machine foundation analysis 

including codel provisions 
 To explain problems related to expansive soils and solution to overcome  
 To explain the concept of slope stability analysis for various slope conditions including 

graphical methods  
 
Course Content 
 
Sheet  pile  structures  - cantilever  sheet  pile  walls  in  granular and cohesive soils - Anchored bulk 
heads - Free  earth  support and fixed earth support methods - Anchors.  
Cofferdams - types - cellular cofferdam - uses - Design by TVA and Cumming's method. 
Well  foundations  -  Types of caissons -  Analysis  of  well  foundations - determination  of  scourdepth  
-  steining thickness - well sinking. 
Foundations subjected to vibrations - elements of  vibrations - Free, damped, free and forced vibrations 
- Design  criteria  -  Pauw's  analogy  -  IS Code of  practice  for  impact  and     reciprocating machines.  

 40 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Foundation drainage and water proofing - Dewatering well points system, sand drains. 
Foundations in expansive soils - Mechanism - factors influencing swelling - Use of Geosynthetics. 
Stability  analysis of slopes - infinite slopes in  sand  and clays - finite slope - Swedish circle - stability  
of  earth  dam  slope  during  steady and sudden draw  down  -  friction circle method - Taylor's stability 
number. Sheet pile structures - Anchored bulk heads 
 
References 
 
1. Bowles, J.E., Foundation Analysis and Design, McGraw Hill., 1996. 
2. Braja M. Das, Principles of Foundation Engineering, Thomos Asia Pvt. Ltd., Singapore, 2005. 
3. Shamsher Prakash, Soil Dynamics, McGraw - Hill Book Company, 1985. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 analyze and design any kind of sheet pile wall system including coffer dam 
 analyze and design well foundation including complete stability analysis 
 estimate soil parameters under dynamic conditions including machine foundations 
 design a suitable foundation system for any kind of problematic soils 
 analyze the stability of any kind of slope by using both theoretical and graphical methods    

 
CE455 HYDROLOGY 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To provide knowledge in the hydrological cycle, precipitation, evapotranspiration, infiltration and 
its measurements 

 To understand the physics of translate of rainfall into runoff modeling of various runoff 
techniques 

 To estimate the runoff 
 To develop ability to apply the analytical and numerical techniques to ground and surface water 

models 
 To understand hydrographs and IUH 

 
Course Content 
 
Precipitation circulation - temperature - Humidity – wind formation and forms of precipitation -  
Interpretation of precipitation data - snow cover and snow fall. Factors affecting and methods of 
determining evaporation, infiltration and evapo-transpiration- Run-off cycle  - factors affecting run-off - 
estimation of run-off by stream gauging - stage - discharge rating curves - Selection of site for a stream 
gauge station. 
Derivation of unit hydrograph from complex storms - unit hydrographs for various duration - Synthetic 
unit hydrograph - Transposing unit hydrograph - Application of the unit     hydrograph. Linear 
Regression - Statistical and probability analysis of hydrological data - Flood frequency   probability and 
stochastic methods - Basics of Stochastic and Deterministic models.  
 
References 
 
1. Ragunath, H.M., Hydrology, Wiley Eastern, 1990. 

 41 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 demonstrate the concepts of hydrograph, S-hydrograph, Unit hydrograph and IUH 
 estimate the hydrological parameters 
 carry out statistical and probability analysis of hydrological data 
 demonstrate the concepts of hydrological systems 
 develop regression models for the analysis of hydrological data 

 
CE456 WATER POWER ENGINEERING  
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To estimate the available hydropower 
 To understand types of hydro-power stations 
 To understand the components and functions of hydro-power system 
 To expose to the types of hydro-power system 
 To study the different types of loads on power plants  

 
Course Content 
 
Source  of  energy – Statistics of power -  hydro  power estimation of water  power  potential  - mini and 
pumped storage plant - cost and  value  of  water power. 
Mini and Pumped storage plants- Penstocks - types and design criteria - anchor blocks - conduit valves  
-  bends  and manifolds - water hammer  - Intakes - canals - forebay - trash rack tunnels - surge tank - 
power plant operation- surface and sub surface power stations. 
Description and function of various hydraulic, electrical and mechanical equipment - power plant 
operation pertaining to base load and peak load  
Principles included in the planning of a surface and sub surface power stations. 
Elementary treatment of the principles involved in tidal power. 
 
References 
 
1. Barrows, H.K., Water Power Engineering, McGraw Hill, 1990. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 estimate the available hydropower in a project 
 select suitable types of hydro-power system 
 design penstock and anchor blocks 
 analyze the different types of loads on power plants 
 design the components of Tidal power plant 

 
 
 
 

 42 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

CE457 STRUCTURAL DYNAMICS  
 
Course Objectives: 
 

 To introduce the concepts of dynamic systems  
 To study the dynamic response of SDOF  
 To study the dynamic response of MDOF 
 To introduce the continuous systems subjected to different types of dynamic loads 
 To learn free and forced vibrations response of structural systems 

 
Course Content 
 
Dynamic analysis - Elements of vibratory systems and simple Harmonic Motion- Mathematical models 
of SDOF systems - Principle of Virtual displacements -  Evaluation  of damping resonance. 
Fourier series expression for loading - (blast or earthquake) - Duhamel’s integral - Numerical evaluation 
- Expression for generalized system properties - vibration analysis Rayleigh’s method - Rayleigh - Ritz 
method. 
Differential equation of motion - Beam flexure including shear deformation and rotatory inertia - 
Vibration analysis using finite element method for beams and frames  
Evaluation of structural property matrices - Natural vibration - Solution of the eigen value problem - 
Iteration due to Holzer and Stodola  
Idealization of multi-storeyed frames - analysis to blast loading - Deterministic analysis of earthquake 
response - lumped SDOF system - Design of earthquake resistant structures.  
 
References 
 
1. Mario Paz, Structural Dynamics, CBS, Publishers, 1987. 
2. Roy R Craig, Jr., Structural Dynamics, John Wiley & Sons, 1981.  
3. A.K. Chpora “Dynamics of Structures Theory and Application to Earthquake Engineering” Pearson 

Education, 2001. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the concepts of dynamic systems  
 identify, formulate and solve dynamic response of SDOF  
 identify, formulate and solve dynamic response of MDOF 
 analyze continuous systems subjected to different types of dynamic loads 
 identify, formulate and solve free and forced vibrations response of structural systems 

 
CE458 FINITE ELEMENT METHOD 
 
Course objectives: 

 To study the strain –displacement and linear constitutive relation 
 To understand the numerical techniques applied in FEM 
 Establishment of element stiffness and load vector 
 To study about the 2-D isoparametric concepts 
 To analyze the 2-D frame elements using FEM techniques 

 43 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course Content 
 
Differential equilibrium equations - strain displacement relation - linear constitutive relation - special 
cases - Principle of stationary potential energy - application to finite element methods - Some numerical 
techniques in finite element Analysis 
Displacement models - convergence requirements. Natural coordinate systems - Shape function. 
Interpolation function. Linear and quadratic elements - Lagrange & Serendipity elements.  Strain 
displacement matrix - element stiffness matrix and nodal load vector 
Two dimensional isoparametric elements - Four noded quadrilateral elements - triangular elements. 
Computation of stiffness matrix for isoparametric elements - numerical integration (Gauss quadrature) 
Convergence criteria for isoparametric elements. 
Assemblage of elements – Direct stiffness method.  Special characteristics of stiffness matrix - 
Boundary condition & reaction - Gauss elimination and LDLT decomposition.  Basic steps in finite 
element analysis. 
Analysis of framed Structures: 2D – truss element - 2D - beam element. Analysis of plate bending- 
displacement functions - plate bending Elements. Plane stress and plane strain analysis: Triangular 
elements - Rectangular elements 
 
References 
 
1. Krishnamoorthy, C.S, Finite Element Analysis Theory & Programming, McGraw- Hill, 1995. 
2. Desai C.S and Abel, J.F., Introduction to the finite element Method, Affiliated East west Press Pvt. 

Ltd. New Delhi 2000. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 demonstrate the differential equilibrium equations and their relationship 
 apply numerical methods to FEM 
 demonstrate the displacement models and load vectors 
 compute the stiffness matrix for isoperimetric elements 
 analyze plane stress and plane strain problems 

 
CE459 MODELS FOR AIR AND WATER QUALITY 
 

Course objectives: 
 

 To introduce the mathematical models and the modeling approach to water quality 
 to present the mass balance basis for water quality models, simplified water quality models for 

streams and rivers, lakes and reservoirs for conservative and non-conservative materials 
 to describe the various models for microbial growth and limitations 
 to address the simple air quality models for point and line sources 
 to review the simple models for estuaries 

 

Course Content 
 
Introduction to Mathematical Models: Modeling approaches to water quality - classification of models   
Mathematical models for water quality - model development, calibration and verification - cost: benefit 
analysis using models, Model requirements and limitations. D.O. Models for Streams: Dissolved oxygen 
model for streams - sources and sinks of dissolved oxygen  

 44 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Estimation of system parameters - Streeter - Phelps model - oxygen 'sag' curve - determination of 
deoxygenation and reaeration coefficients - Benthal oxygen demand - mass transport mechanisms - 
Advective and diffusive mass transport  
Models by O'connor, Dobbins and Thomann. Models for Estuary and Lakes: Physical chemical and 
biological processes in estuaries - water quality distribution in estuaries - modeling estuaries and lakes 
for water quality - temperature models for lakes and rivers  
Models for microorganisms decay, nitrogen and phytoplankton. Air quality models: Micrometeorological 
processes, wind rose, dispersion, coefficients and stability classes, Gaussian and dispersion model, 
Regional air quality models,  
 
References 
 
1. Chapra, Steven C., "Surface water quality modeling", McGraw Hill Book Company, New York, 

1997. 
2. Gilbert M. Masters, "Introduction to Environmental Engineering and Science", 2nd  Edition, Prentice 

Hall, 1998. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 evaluate the physical, chemical and biological water quality which is essential for the abatement 
of water pollution 

 predict the quality of water and air through modeling  
 recognize the risks of disposal of treated wastewater into the river 
 design sound and sustainable water and air models under specified conditions 

 
CE460 TRANSPORTATION PLANNING 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To know about the process and concepts of transportation planning 
 To study about trip generation 
 To study about trip distribution 
 To study about modal split analysis 
 To study about trip assignment 

 
Course Content 
 
Transportation Planning Process and Concepts- Role of transportation - Transportation problems - 
Urban travel characteristics - Concept of travel demand - Demand function - demand estimation - 
Sequential, recursive and simultaneous processes  
Trip Generation Analysis - Zoning - Types and sources of data - Expansion factors - Accuracy checks - 
Trip generation models - Zonal models - Household models - Category analysis - Trip attractions of 
work centers.  
Trip Distribution Analysis - Trip distribution models - Growth factor models - Gravity models - 
Opportunity models.  
Mode Split Analysis - Mode split Models - Mode choice behavior, Competing modes, Mode split curves, 
Probabilistic models.  

 45 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Traffic Assignment - Route split analysis: Elements of transportation networks, Nodes and links - 
minimum path trees - all-or-nothing assignment - Multipath assignment - Capacity restraint.  
References 
 
1. Hutchinson B.G., Principles of Urban Transportation System Planning, McGraw Hill, 2007.  
2. Bruton M.J., Introduction to Transportation Planning, Hutchinson, London, 1992. 
3. C. Jotin Khisty, B. Kent Lall, Transportation Engineering, Prentice Hall of India, 2002.  
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the principles of the transportation planning process and demand estimation 
 analyse the trip production and trip attraction models 
 analyse the growth factor, gravity and opportunity models 
 apply the mode choice behaviour and mode split models 
 apply the shortest path models for route assignment 

 
CE461 PAVEMENT ANALYSIS AND DESIGN 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To study about the types and components of pavements 
 To learn about the stresses in flexible pavements and equivalent single wheel load 
 To study the design of flexible pavements 
 To learn about the stresses in rigid pavements 
 To study the design of rigid pavements 

 
Course Content 
 
Pavements - Types and Component - Factors affecting Design and Performance of Pavements, 
Comparison between Highway and Airport pavements - Functions and Significance of Sub grade 
properties 
Stresses in Flexible Pavements - Stresses and Deflections in Homogeneous Masses - Burmister's 2-
layer, 3-layer Theories - Wheel Load Stresses, ESWL of Multiple Wheels Repeated Loads and EWL 
factors  
Flexible Pavement Design - Empirical - Semi-empirical and Theoretical Approaches; Principles and 
procedure, design, Advantages and Applications of different Pavement Design Methods - Stresses in 
Rigid pavements - Types of Stresses and Causes - Factors influencing the Stresses, General 
conditions in Rigid Pavement Analysis, ESWL, Wheel Load Stresses, Warping Stresses, Friction 
Stresses, Combined Stresses  
Rigid Pavement Design - Types of Joints in Cement Concrete Pavements and their Functions, Joint 
Spacings, Design of Slab Thickness, Design of Joint Details for Longitudinal Joints, Contraction Joints 
and Expansion Joints, IRC Method of Design  
 
References 
 
1. Yoder and Witezak, Principles of pavement design¸ John Wiley and sons, 1975  
2. Yang, Design of functional pavements, Mc Graw -Hill, 2004.  
3. IRC: 58 - 2002, Guidelines for the Design of Plain Jointed Rigid Pavements for Highways 

 46 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

4. IRC:37 - 2001, Guidelines for the Design of Flexible Pavements 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 identify the pavement components and compare highway and airport pavements 
 calculate stresses and ESWL in flexible pavements 
 design the flexible pavement using empirical and semi empirical methods 
 analyze the warping, friction, wheel load stress and calculate the combined stress 
 design rigid pavements by IRC method and evaluate the pavements 

 
CE462 ADVANCED SURVEYING TECHNIQUES 
 
Course Objectives: 
 

 To know about significance of advanced surveying in field measurements in terms of utility and 
precision of data collection 

 To learn on the principles of Electronic distance measurements, Total station and their 
accuracy 

 To get introduced to the concept of photogrammetry in preliminary identification and map 
making  

 To know in detail the concept of remote sensing in identification of land features from space 
and to get introduced to different data acquisition techniques like LIDAR, RADAR 

 To get introduced to the field of geodesy, coordinate systems, Map projections,  GPS, its 
working principles, data collection, data processing and analysis 

 
Course Content 
 
Electromagnetic distance measurement (EDM) – Principle of EDM Carrier waves – Types of EDM 
instruments – Distomat – Total Station – Principle – procedure & surveying using Total Station – 
precise leveling -  micro-optic theodolite. 
Photogrammetry – Terrestrial and Aerial Photogrammetry – Horizontal position of a point from 
photographic measurement – elevation of a point – Determination of focal length of camera - Geometry 
and scale of vertical photographs – Ground co-ordinates from vertical photographs - Relief 
displacement – Planimetric mapping from vertical photos – Stereoscopy– Photo interpretation. 
Remote sensing – concepts – Idealized remote sensing system – characteristics – Types of remote 
sensing system – Remote sensing from space – Data interpretation – application of remote sensing – 
LIDAR – RADAR - SONAR. 
Geodesy – Figure of earth – Classification – Earth surface - Geodetic reference surfaces - Coordinate 
systems – Geodetic datums and elements – Map – Scale of map – projection – UTM – Map projection 
of India – Space Geodesy – VLBI – SLR - LLR.  
GPS Basics – system overview – working principle of GPS – Satellite ranging –calculating position – 
Ranging errors and its correction – GPS surveying Methods – static, Rapid static, DGPS and Kinematic 
methods – Real time and post processing DGPS – visibility diagram – GAGAN. 
 
References 
 
1. Duggal, S.K. Surveying Vol. II, Tata McGraw Hill, 2004. 
2. Punmia, B.C. Surveying Vol.III, Standard Publishers, 2005. 

 47 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

3. Arora, K. R. Surveying Vol. III, Standard Book House, 1996. 
4. Satheesh Gopi. Advanced Surveying, Pearson Education, 2007. 
5. Satheesh Gopi. The Global Positioning System and Surveying using GPS, Tata   McGraw, 2005. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 

 apply advanced surveying techniques in different fields of civil engineering 
 select the advanced surveying technique which is best suited for a work  
 apply total station and EDM in distance measurement and traversing  
 demonstrate the principles of the earth surface, its projections and different coordinates 

involved in map making  
 apply GPS in transportation engineering, structural engineering and land use planning 

 
CE463   STEEL-CONCRETE COMPOSITE STRUCTURES 
 
Course Objectives: 
 

 To introduce the concept of composite construction and their applications in engineering  
 To discuss shear connector types, degree of shear connector, interaction and their strength 
 To introduce design of composite beams under propped and un-propped condition 
 To introduce design of different types of composite deck slabs 
 To discuss effects of temperature, shrinkage and creep and cyclic loading on composite 

sections 
 
Course Content 
 
Introduction – types – advantages – comparison – applications - limit states of composite sections – 
introduction to plastic analysis – mechanism of composite members 
Shear connectors – types of shear connectors – degree of shear connection – partial and complete 
shear connections – strength of shear connectors – experimental evaluation of shear connectors. 
Analysis and design of composite beams without profile sheet - propped condition – un-propped 
condition – deflection - design of partial shear connection 
Design of composite beam with profile sheet – propped and un-propped condition – deflection of 
composite beams –design of partial shear connection 
Introduction – Composite slabs – profiled sheeting – sheeting parallel to span – sheeting perpendicular 
to span – analysis and design of composite floor system.   
 
References 
 
1. Johnson R.P., “Composite Structures of Steel and Concrete”’ Volume-I, Black Well Scientific 

Publication, U.K., 1994 
2. Teaching Resources for “Structural Steel Desgin”. Vol.2 of 3, Institute of Steel Development and 

Growth (INSDAG), 2000 
3. Narayanan R., “Composite Steel Structures – Advances, Design and construction, Elsevier, Applied 

Science, U.K., 1987 
4. Owens, G.W & Knowels, P., Steel Designers Manual,” (fifth edition), Steel Concrete Institute (U.K), 

Oxford Blackwell Scientific Publication, 1992. 
5. IS 11384 – 1985 Indian Standard Code of Practice for Composite Construction in Structural Steel 

and Concrete, Bureau of Indian Standards, New Delhi 

 48 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply the concepts of composite construction in engineering 
 analyze the behaviour of shear connectors, degree of shear connection and their interaction 
 design composite beams under propped and un-propped condition 
 design different types of composite deck slabs 
 analyze the effects of temperature, shrinkage and creep and cyclic loading on composite 

sections 
 
CE464 GEOTECHNICAL EARTHQUAKE ENGINEERING 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To explain the mechanism of earthquake and its related causes to build structures and in-situ 
soils 

 To explain how ground motion is recorded and how do quantify the earthquake intensity and 
frequency related parameters 

 To explain how seismic site investigation will be done and seismic soil design parameters  are 
estimated 

 To explain how seismic resistant design of foundation will be done and also explain the concept 
of liquefaction and related causes including codal recommendations 

 To explain how to do hazard assessment and mitigation and explain how do prepare a risk and 
microzonation mapping  

 
Course Content 

 
Mechanism of Earthquakes - Causes of earthquake - Earthquake Fault sources - Elastic Rebound 
theory - Seismic wave in Earthquake shaking - terminology - Locating an earthquake - Quantification of 
earthquakes.  Strong Motion Records -characteristics of ground motion - Factors influencing Ground 
motion - Estimation of frequency content parameters 
Seismic site investigations – Selected Case Studies - Evaluation of Dynamic soil properties – Codal 
Provisions 
Design Ground Motion - Developing Design Ground Motion-Codal recommendations. 
Earthquake Resistant Design of foundation of buildings - Design considerations -. Earthquake 
Response of slopes - Evaluation of slope stability - Liquefaction-Susceptibility - Liquefaction 
Resistance-Codal recommendations. 
Risk mapping - Hazard assessment – Mitigation measures - Seismic microzonation and its importance  
 
References 
 
1. Kameswara Rao, N.S.V., Dynamics soil tests and applications, Wheeler Publishing - New Delhi, 2000. 
2. Krammer S.L., Geotechnical Earthquake Engineering, Prentice Hall, International Series,  Pearson 

Education (Singapore) Pvt. Ltd., 2004. 
3. Kameswara Rao, Vibration Analysis and Foundation Dynamics, Wheeler 
4. Robert W. Day, Geotechnical Earthquake Engineering Hand book, McGraw Hill, 2002 
 
 
 

 49 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 demonstrate the principles of earthquake loading  
 quantify earthquake intensity and ground motion  
 estimate seismic soil design parameters  
 analyze and design seismic resistant foundation for buildings  
 prepare soil risk and microzonation maps 

 
AR451 URBAN AND REGIONAL PLANNING 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To understand the trend of urbanization and planning process 
 To study about various types of plans 
 To study about the planning principles 
 To know how to implement the plan and financing for plan 
 To know about the urban development control regulations 

 
Course Content 
 
Definition and classification of urban areas - Trend of urbanization - Planning process - Various stages 
of the planning process - Surveys in planning.   
Plans - Delineation of planning areas- Regional plan, Master plan, Structure plan, detailed development 
plan and Transportation plan. 
Planning principles of Ebenezer Howard (Garden city movement), Patrick Geddes, Dr.C.A.Doxiades, 
Soria Y Mata (Linear city) and Clarence, A. Perry (The neighborhood concept). 
Plan implementation- Urban Planning agencies and their functions - Financing- Public, private, Non- 
governmental organizations- Public participation in Planning. 
Development control regulations- Town and country planning act- Building bye-laws. 
 
References 
 
1. Hutchinson, B.G., Principles of Urban Transport Systems Planning, Scripta, McGraw-Hill, New 

York, 1974. 
2. Claire, Hand Book of Urban Planning, Van  Nostrand  Book  Company, 1974. 
3. Gallian, B. Arthur and Simon Eisner, The Urban Pattern - City Planning and Design, Affiliated Press 

Pvt. Ltd., New Delhi, 1985. 
4. Margaret Roberts, An Introduction to Town Planning Techniques, Hutchinson, London, 1980. 
5. Hiraskar,G.K., Fundamentals of Town Planning, Dhanpat  Rai Publications,  1992.  
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 identify the stages of planning process and surveys in planning 
 apply the principles of the regional, master, structural and detailed development plans 
 apply the concepts of the garden city movement, linear city and neighbourhood  

 50 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

 demonstrate the functions of planning and financing agencies 
 apply the town and country plan act and building by-laws 

 
MA302 OPERATIONS RESEARCH TECHNIQUES IN CIVIL ENGINEERING 
 
Course objectives: 
 

 To study various optimization techniques in real world problems related to civil engineering 
 To study the inventory models 
 To study about assigning jobs to people in an efficient way 
 To study about sequencing techniques 

 
Course Content 
 
Inventory with uniform demand with finite rate of replenishment without and with shortage - Buffer stock 
- Price break 
Queuing Theory - M/M/1 and M/M/C models with infinite and finite waiting space.   
Dynamic programming - Principle of optimality - recursive equation approach - application to allocation 
shortest path and production schedule - Sequencing - Johnson's algorithm - n jobs through 2 machines, 
n jobs through m machines, 2 jobs through 2 machines.   
Replacement problem - Present worth factor - Group replacement - Nonlinear programming - 
Lagrange's multiplier's method - Kuhn-Tucker's condition - Quadratic programming - Wolfe's method. 
 
References 
 
1. Taha, H.A., Operations Research: An Introduction, Prentice Hall of India, New Delhi, 2003. 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 solve the optimization problems 
 apply LPP to Transportations problems which is essential for a Civil Engineer 
 solve assignment problems in an easy way 
 assess the real conditions of a project so that loss can be avoided 
 solve the Linear programming problems for minimizing the project cost and maximizing its 

profit  
 
HM404 CREATIVE WRITING THROUGH LITERATURE 
 
Course objectives: 
  

 To motivate the students for creative writing 
 To familiarize them with literary Forms and Figures of speech 
 To expose them to the attractions and the challenges involved in creative writing 
 To emphasize the need for sustained effort at developing creativity 
 To enable them to write poems. Short stories, blogs, essays which can be published in 

magazines or web journals 
 

 51 
 



Department of Civil Engineering, National Institute of Technology, Tiruchirappalli – 620 015. 
 

Course Content 
 
Understanding literary forms - Thinking about texts: Role-playing the Reader, the Author, and the  
Individual as both the Reader-Author - Intensive reading of a poem,  short story, a novel, a bestseller, a 
film, a drama, an essay, a news story, an Ad-campaign, an Interview - Designing the individual reading 
list. Pursuing one’s own competence. 
 Dissertation:  Performance in the chosen genre. 
 
References 
 
1. Abrams, M.H.  A Glossary of Literary Terms. (Seventh Edition). Thomson: New York. 1999. 
2.  Packard, William. The Poet’s Craft. Virago: New York. 2003. 
3. Tuchman, Barbara.  Practising History. Routledge: London, 2006. 
4. Bowra, C.M.  The Romantic Imagination.Faber: London. 1965. 
5. Wallace, Irving. The Making of a Bestseller. Corgi: New York, 1984 
 
Course outcomes: 
 
On completion of the course, the students will be able to: 
 

 apply various sources of creative writing like a museum, an Archive, the Library, the 
newspaper, Film, the advertisement 

 demonstrate a variety of genres of Creative Literature like the Poem, the Novel, the Film, and 
the image 

 demonstrate ideas like Postcolonialism, De-Colonizing the mind, working in white spaces, 
Postmodernism, Existentialism 

 develop the language, methodology and vocabulary to read and criticize a poem, a film, a 
novel, an advertisement 

 apply the methods of Creative thinkers and writers like S T Coleridge, Ngugi Wa Thiongo, Sri 
Aurobindo, Vikram Chandra, Raja Rao, and Salman Rushdie 

 
 

 
 

 

 52
